title,selftext,subreddit
Want to give first blowjob,"I’m in a relationship with a woman who doesn’t like bisexuals and isn’t open with her sexuality. I never got to give my first blowjob to a man or trans woman and sometimes it bothers me. I am not the type to run around and cheat. 

Any advice?",lgbtsex
Sticking your tongue down the peehole,"So, I don't know about you guys, but I've done it several times with this guy I know.

When I started to lick the head of his penis, I also stick my tongue down his peehole over and over again, like a penis in an asshole. You know, like a penetration, his peehole wasn't that big.

&amp;#x200B;

Does anybody ever get their peehole licked by a tongue? and does it feel good or should I just stop?",lgbtsex
Laurenz Baars is Gay and not afraid to show it,"&amp;#x200B;

[Laurenz Baars](https://i.redd.it/cg6pn5k01ju11.jpg)",lgbtsex
Laurenz Baars,,lgbtsex
Info about a relationship and sexual health education program for male couples :),"Hello! My name is Arielle and I'm a queer researcher and relationship skills coach at Northwestern University. I want to give you guys some info about 2GETHER, a project we have going on for male couples.

2GETHER is a paid research study that involves a relationship education program-- where you and your partner can learn skills to strengthen your relationship, like improving your communication, sexual health and satisfaction. We have a national online program and an in-person program for people who live in Chicago.

There will be follow-up surveys and free at-home STI testing before and after the 2GETHER program. Because we're a university, all data we collect is protected by IRB and federal regulations. If you and your partner are eligible, you'll get to read over a consent form, which has more information about your privacy rights.

And obviously we're going to pay you for your time-- specifically $250 each for completing all parts of the study!

Want to find out if you qualify, or learn more? Check out our eligibility screener: [https://redcap.nubic.northwestern.edu/redcap/surveys/?s=YXKMW9JFXY](https://redcap.nubic.northwestern.edu/redcap/surveys/?s=YXKMW9JFXY)

Even more info on our website: [http://2getherstudy.northwestern.edu/](http://2getherstudy.northwestern.edu/)

IRB #STU00202802, STU00202939",lgbtsex
Anal Sex: What You Need to Know,"This is to answer some questions about anal sex.

With respect to your body, it is ALWAYS important to have the correct information. Not understanding how your body works, or the basics of sexual health can be detrimental to one's wellbeing.

With that said, I'm going to give you the ins and outs of anal play!

In our day and age, it is imperative that we speak about all forms sex, because not everyone is doing, or wants to do for that matter, the classic ""penis in the vagina"" sex. If that is what you prefer and you're just looking to spice things up in the bedroom, or maybe that style of sex isn't for you and you want to try something else, I'm going to help you learn how! Yet, even if you conclude that anal sex isn't going to be on your to-do list, it won't hurt to know how it all works.

If reading about anal sex makes your uncomfortable, that is alright. I understand topics like this may seem taboo to some or may make others feel awkward. No pressure, just discontinue reading :)

First and foremost, there is an abundance of information on the internet about anal play, however, most of what you'll come across are either pornography or guidance for very experienced sexual connoisseurs to try something new. Where are the pioneers and first-time explorers suppose to look? Where is the map to guide them on what may possibly be their first expedition to the southern frontier?

Well, ladies and gents, look no further. Welcome to anal 101!

""THE ANUS IS RICH WITH EXTREMELY SENSITIVE NERVE ENDINGS THAT FEEL INCREDIBLE WHEN STIMULATED."" 
Why anal?
Backdoor sex, albeit somewhat labeled with infamy, is an entirely natural sexual activity for individuals to enjoy. Believe it or not, the human race has been having anal sex since the dawn of time. It has even been recorded that the Ancient Greeks and other cultures engaged in this festive activity. So if you're concerned that giving it a shot is weird or gross, don't worry, it isn't whatsoever!

The anus is rich with extremely sensitive nerve endings that feel incredible when stimulated. The opening of the anus is where most of the nerve endings are present, so if you want to get those good feelings without putting anything up there, you are able to!

It is worth noting, however, that--like all sex acts on the planet--they are not enjoyed by all, and that is completely acceptable. Different strokes for different folks! Everyone should engage in sexual activity that they find pleasurable, and do what they think feels good. There is nothing wrong with how you individually choose to explore your sexuality, and no specific way is better than others.

Anal when you have a prostate
 Prostate Anatomy

For those of us who have prostates, receiving anal sex can be an absolutely breathtaking experience!

Some of you may be thinking, ""What the hell is a prostate?"" The prostate is a little gland close to the bladder that creates prostate fluid - one of the primary elements of semen. It can be found right in front of the rectum and is able to be stimulated with fingers, a toy, or a penis. It feels like a small, solid lump.

It feels amazing to have one's prostate played with. This element of the male anatomy is what makes anal sex so appealing to male. Moreover, it is entirely possible to have hands-free, prostate orgasms! They'll leave your legs wobbly.

Anal when you don't have a prostate
Female anatomy anal sex

If you have a vagina, this does not mean fun anal-times are off the table. Many vagina owners adore anal sex. For persons without a prostate, having your anus stimulated can still be an experience that will throw your head back! Like I said earlier, there are tons of nerve endings back there!

""IT CAN BE DESCRIBED AS A FEELING OF 'ENCHANTED FULLNESS'.""
While the anus may not be as supple as the vagina, remember, it still has the ability to accommodate a baby's head by nature's design! Furthermore, the anus is extraordinarily tight, and the simple feeling of having something inside your anus is a very unique experience. It can be detailed as a feeling of enchanted fullness.

Asking your partner if they may be ready to try anal play
So if you're thinking you may be ready to give or receive anal sex, it is very important to speak to your partner prior to your anus-tour. I recommend getting an ENTHUSIASTIC consent before embarking - this will make it an extremely enjoyable time.

Bringing up the topic of anal sex can be a bit scary, regardless of your level of experience. I suggest sitting down one-on-one with your significant other, and let them know that anal sex is something you're interested in trying. Be sincere with your intentions and how you feel about it. In a healthy relationship, you should be able to authentically discuss your wants and desires. Moreover, everyone wants to have a satisfying experience. If they give you green light, it is time to get the ball rolling!

Take it slow - I'm serious
I will not sugarcoat this. Quickly and frantically rushing into anal play can be painful.

You must take it slowly. The anus is a muscle, and like any muscle, must be worked up in order to take on a bigger load. However, instead of picking things up, you're inserting them. I advise starting with a finger, a small toy, or a butt plug (with LOTS of lube). Carefully warm up your behind and lightly massage the anus with your well-lubricated finger/toy/plug. As you become increasingly excited and comfortable, slowly work the object inside. Then, gently move it around the anus relax and ease any tension as it gets use to having an object inserted.

DO NOT put any toy inside of you that does not have a T-shaped or flared base. It is ﻿terrible﻿ to lose something inside your behind. The rectum is quite large inside, and it is more complex to remove lost objects than simply ""pooping"" them out.

""WHEN YOU BEGIN TO HAVE ANAL INTERCOURSE, GO SLOWLY.""
When you begin to have anal intercourse, go slowly. Frequent communication with your partner will help keep things cordial and assure both of you are having a pleasurable experience. If you find it is painful at any point, say something and stop! If this happens, relax, take a break, then slowly ease back into it. No communication and lots of tension can make the entire ordeal less enjoyable.

Lube is not an option
You must have lube. No, you NEED lube. This is not an option. If you're brand new to anal play, you CANNOT skip this. The anus does not have naturally occurring lubricants like a vagina does, so if you want to have a gratifying experience, you need lube.

Likewise, condoms are also a necessity. While there is no risk whatsoever of pregnancy during anal intercourse, STIs are still out and about, and having unprotected anal sex will put you at risk of contraction.

What lubricant should you use? A water-based one. Silicone lubricants can ultimately cause latex condoms to deteriorate because of their high oil content. The last thing you want is a broken condom stuck in your or your partner's ass.

In the same way, stay away from oil-based lubes. As already said, the oil will damage latex condoms and put them at risk for breaking.

Using an unflavored, unscented, and water-based lubricant is your best bet!

Poop may be present
Uhm, what?

Yes, this may actually happen, but it seriously is not something to worry about!

With the amount of joy and pleasure anal sex can bring, I didn't want this to be the first thing that comes's to your mind. That is why I left this until the end.

""YOU MAY FEEL FECES WHEN INSIDE YOUR PARTNER.""
In ALL of my anal-expeditions (and there have been quite a few), I have NEVER once come into contact with fecal matter.

Poop does not just sit inside the anus waiting to come out--it is stored in the intestine. So in 99% of cases, this is a non-issue. However, I DO have to put this here because every once in a while I hear some horror story about how someone found poop on the end of their penis.

It is NOT a huge deal. Everyone has a butt. Everyone poops. End of story.

Anal sex can be an absolutely incredible experience, and I sincerely wish everyone has the opportunity to experience it. Don't let poopy tales get in the way.

So, no more dilly-dallying. Find your partner, sit down with them, and start exploring :)

ctto: [here] (https://sextoysformen.co/blogs/blogroll/anal-sex-what-you-need-to-know)",lgbtsex
Learn more about the ANCHORS Study!,"Research Study for FL Residents! 
The goal of ANCHORS is to learn more about the alcohol/other substance use and sexual activity of men who have sex with men to inform a new computer-and phone-based intervention that will help to reduce heavy drinking and risky sex. 
Possible compensation if you are selected to complete a web survey. 
Visit us on the web at www.anchorsresearch. org
Call or text us at 352-214-4047 to learn more!

",lgbtsex
Suck,When sucking dick what do you prefer.. a circumcised penis or not? ,lgbtsex
How and how long,Is it wrong to ask someone how they got poz and how long they’ve been poz ,lgbtsex
Top 10 LGBTQ+ Sex Ed Resources!,,lgbtsex
Cis-Gf cannot make me cum anymore,"Need help, please. My girlfriend cannot make me orgasm anymore and is unwilling to stimulate me anally very often, or even at all. During sex, either I fake it or just apologize that I can’t finish after I help her to climax. I instead spend my time looking at other trans women or things that turn me on like hung penises and sissies etc. I’ve tried explaining to her that I am bisexual but she just thinks everything is fine. She tries to be supportive but just wants to live a plain-jane man-woman life. Any suggestions? I have no desire to cheat and am still in love with her.",lgbtsex
Learn more about the ANCHORS Study!,"
Research Study for FL Residents! 
The goal of ANCHORS is to learn more about the alcohol/other substance use and sexual activity of men who have sex with men to inform a new computer-and phone-based intervention that will help to reduce heavy drinking and risky sex. 
Possible compensation if you are selected to complete a web survey. 
Visit us on the web at www.anchorsresearch. org
Call or text us at 352-214-4047 to learn more!

",lgbtsex
"[Cycle] Good Sex, Bad Sex","Hi Everybody,

I’m male. 44. I’m wondering about a specific pattern that I’ve noticed for several years now.

Basically, it seems like I go through these cycles. At the moment I’m having GREAT sex. I wake up with an erection. Sex is really affectionate and passionate. Orgasms are intense and explosive. Sex is the most rewarding thing in life.

Judging by past experience, this phase will last about two weeks.

After that, I’ll go through a dry spell. Maybe I’ll still have sex, but it’s nowhere near as good. It’s kind of perfunctory. Takes longer to have an orgasm and when they’re do happen they’re sort of “meh.” I wake up flaccid rather than hard. I start to panic about whether I have some sort of erectile dysfunction and if I’ll ever enjoy sex again.

But those cycles pass, too.

I guess my question is, is this normal?

If these cycles are determined by something external, I haven’t figured it out yet. Nothing in particular changes about my diet or physical activity or alcohol intake. I realize that stress can inhibit how much a person enjoys sex, but, like I said, I’m having great sex at the moment, and my work life is miserable right now, so it doesn’t seem to be that, either.

I’d love to be able to enjoy sex all the time rather than go through the “bummer” phases.

Any thoughts or advice appreciated. Thanks!
",lgbtsex
Purchased a vixskin dildo. Looking for a water based lube that I don’t have to reapply so often. Any suggestions ?,,lgbtsex
just random thought,im straight but i was just thinking and i finally figured out what lgbt meant without having to look it up... but why isnt it hbt because lesbian and gay are both homosexual ,lgbtsex
Sexual Synesthesia survey,"I've been presented with a possibility to write an article for an upcoming online publication. This is a topic of interest to me, because any article you find on this topic all goes off of a single survey taken by only 19 people -- 5 years ago. I personally experience this and I find my results are inconsistent (most notably in the conclusion related to sexual satisfaction) with the results of the survey.

This survey is for people with sexual synesthesia ONLY (involuntary cognitive experiences brought about by sexual encounters, such as seeing seemingly absent color during orgasm or states of high arousal). I would love it if you found time to take this 10 question survey. PMs are welcome, if you want to know more or discuss it at more length. Feel free to post here or PM me with any additional comments (i ran out of room to add this option on the survey)

[https://www.surveymonkey.com/r/FHZ5VYC](https://www.surveymonkey.com/r/FHZ5VYC)

&amp;#x200B;

\[Edit: The previous survey showed that despite predictions,  people with synesthesia experienced less satisfaction than the average person, possibly because of the feelings of isolation/dissociation. So far, the results appear that others feel satisfied as well...  I personally find it relaxing, but I can be a bit of a loner.  I don't know if that would have anything to do with it? Feel free to elaborate your thoughts on that.\]",lgbtsex
Sexual preferences you don't know,,lgbtsex
Does being penetrated vaginally and anally feel different physically?,"Just physically speaking, does being penetrated vaginally and anally feel different? If so, can you describe the difference? ",lgbtsex
Experimenting with bicuriosity and exploring myself,"I (22M) started feeling curious about gay sex some months ago. i found a person in the internet and tried some things with him. Everything was safe. It was good. I love girls but if a guy looks good once in a while then why not? 

It is something that I am trying to engage now. I just experiment and if I like something I like it. I like girls but I still was with a guy for fun. 
",lgbtsex
How to Have Better Sex with Prostate Massage + Quick &amp; Easy Guide on Finding it,"A quick guide to having better sex with prostate massage &amp; how to locate the prostate if you're having trouble - this seems to be more common than you think.

Not only is Prostate Massage an extremely pleasurable activity—whether that be solo or with a partner—but it can actually promote improved sexual health for men suffering from prostatitis or an enlarged prostate.

Sometimes referred to as Prostate Massage Therapy or Prostate Milking, Prostate Massage is the Bees Knees—especially if you’ve always thought women had the monopoly on multiple orgasms.

If you feel uneasy at the thought of this, take comfort in the fact that learning how to massage your prostate or having it done for you can provide a myriad of benefits alongside improved sexual performance and, of course, pleasure.

Throughout time, Prostate Massage has historically been used to enhance a man’s sexual aptitude. Very sexually active men or men who had many partners used Prostate Milking as a way to help maintain their regular sexual activity. Today, however, we now know that Prostate Massage brings with it a host of other benefits: the aforementioned points, incredible hands-free orgasms, and improved erectile function.

You can massage your prostate externally or internally, and likewise, each method can be used with a toy [like this one](https://sextoysformen.co/) or your/a partner's fingers. Some men prefer one method of massage over the other, but both can be successfully used to Massage the Prostate and even bring an individual to orgasm. One who regularly employs Prostate Massage will notice improved blood flow, enhanced urinary flow, and a promotion in the integrity and health of the prostate tissue.

Here’s how to get ready if you’ve never done this before. Go ahead and empty out both your bowels and bladder. If you’re going to go the manual route—i.e. use your or a partner’s hand—get a nonlatex glove or condom alongside some water-based lubricant. When you position yourself, you can try leaning over a table, getting on all fours, or laying on your side.

Next, we need to locate the Prostate:

A. Place your palm over your bellybutton, palm facing down, with your middle finger toward your penis. Almost as if you are reaching into your pants straight down.

B. When you push down with your middle finger, you'll feel a bone. That's the pubic bone.

C. The prostate is directly under the pubic bone (and in between the bone and the wall of the intestine, under the bladder).

D. So that you have located the pubic bone, you're going to stick your finger (or toy) in your anus and toward your pubic bone.

E. What does it feel like? Take the tip of your tongue and place it in your cheek between your back molars. Now, feel the tip of your tongue through your cheek with the tip of your middle finger. The prostate is just a firm bump in the middle of a lot of softer tissue like the tip of your tongue inside your cheek.

F. When you hit it, it may feel similar to having to pee, and it will feel really good. Moreover, your penis will start to erect quickly and hands-free.

G. Stimulate it to your heart's content and cum hard!

NOTE: As you stimulate it, you may feel fluid building - and as mentioned - this may feel similar to having to pee. This is NORMAL! Also, some people report having stronger orgasms when they only stimulate their prostate and avoid touching their penis throughout the whole experience - this may be something to try! Above all, remember to experiment and do what feels good!

You can also try applying pressure to the perineum—the area between the scrotum and anus—for additional pleasure. Some men enjoy this, some don’t. It is possible to achieve orgasm through the perineum alone, but not common.

If you choose to use a Prostate Massage Toy, there are numerous ones on the market for internal and external use. I’d suggest picking out a toy that is specifically designed for massaging the prostate—not one that says it can double as a vibrator, clit massager, etc. Since inserting something into your anus can be a delicate process, be careful and get something specifically manufactured for that purpose.

With that said, opting for a vibrating toy is your best option in my opinion. It is best to be able to “set it and forget it” and let the toy do the work—especially if you’ve never done this before! By the same token, be liberal when applying lubricant. I’d recommend using coconut oil, olive oil, or a water-based lubricant.

If done regularly, it may take several weeks to begin to notice many of the noted benefits of prostate massage, however, pleasure and possible hands-free orgasms will be felt immediately!",lgbtsex
"Does anyone else feel like there is a huge pressure on tops to ""perform""?","Title. It seems like every bottom wants a man that has high stamina and control and is able to keep going for at least an hour or so and I just can't do that.

To provide a little but context, I'm a somewhat inexperienced, 21 y/o top (not entirely by choice but that's another personal issue that I'm dealing with at the moment). Stamina has never been my strong suit and controlling my orgasms, even less so. I am recently single, and after we broke up my ex boyfriend said that sex was often disappointing and that really killed me inside because he knew how self conscious I was about this sort of thing.

Often times I can only go for a few minutes with a partner until I need to take a break to keep from finishing too quickly. I can't go too fast or too hard because that will only make me finish faster.

I honestly don't know what I can do. Any advice?",lgbtsex
Overworked prostate?,"My boyfriend and I have had more frequent sex than normal recently and last night I was struck with a new problem. I had trouble as he was getting up to speed, and as he got closer to our normal pace, it felt more like he was just shoving around my insides rather than just smacking around my prostate. I tried to settle my mind, but as he kept going I started to feel physically I'll and had to stop. 

Anybody have any experience with anything similar?",lgbtsex
Std exposure question,"So I have a friend living with me who I have sex with and we're not exclusive and he slept with someone a couple weeks ago and was notified the other guy tested positive for syphilis and his exposure was approximately 2 weeks ago. Naturally, we freaked out and both got tested thinking we both had syphilis and transmitted it between ourselves and to the other guy since he supposedly only has sex with my friend.

We both got tested yesterday and he was negative for everything and I'm still awaiting my results however, is it pretty safe to say I'm going to be negative for everything considering we have sec regularly? ",lgbtsex
Learn more about the ANCHORS Study!,"Research study for FL residents! The goal of ANCHORS is to learn more about the alcohol/other substance use and sexual activity of men who have sex with men to inform a new computer- and phone-based intervention that will help to reduce heavy drinking and risky sex. Possible compensation if you are selected to complete a web-survey. 

Visit us on the web at www.anchorsresearch. org

Call or text us at  352-214-4047 to learn more!",lgbtsex
Not sure how to let my boyfriend know I am becoming bicurious,"So I’ve been dating my current boyfriend for a year now and I’ve realized I may be bisexual. 

How do I go about telling him I want to explore my sexuality with other women? Should I even tell him this? I love my boyfriend and don’t plan on ending things between us. 

TL;DR How do I tell my boyfriend of one year I want to explore my sexuality while staying together?",lgbtsex
My girlfriend (19F) and I (20F) had really good sex in the beginning of our relationship. But after a few months of being together things quickly died. She says it’s because she isn’t confident enough and her depression makes her not have a sex drive so we go without having sex for months at a time.,At first it was hard for me because I have a really high sex drive and we would talk things out. She said she was going to talk to a therapist; I even suggested we talk to a couples therapist and she agreed but we never had time and every time I bring it up she says yes we’ll do it but then it gets ignored. I try to masturbate but I want something intimate. I want her. I get mad when I find out she masturbated when I’m not there. I feel betrayed because I’m over here waiting for her to initiate something sexual but she never does. Then when I try to I get shut down by her to stop which I totally respect. But I have needs to. She even brought up the idea of me having fwb with someone but I don’t want to. I just want her. I’m committed to her. I love her. I don’t really look at anyone else and find them attractive. I’m just tired of feeling unwanted by her. I stay because I love this girl. I’m ready to start a future with her. I want things to work out between us but I hate feeling unwanted. We have been together for a year and half. We also tried experimenting with toys which worked good for two months but then everything just died out from there. Now she only wants me to please her once in a while and I rarely get something reciprocated because she gets too tired.  ,lgbtsex
My girlfriend (pre-op MTF) and I (post-op metoidioplasty FTM) are looking for ideas to try in bed.,,lgbtsex
I'm a closet NB AMAB. I want to know who would find me attractive.,"I think I could be regarded as NB or gender queer.

I'm AMAB. I have an average body shape, 180 cm or 5'10. I have very light body hair. There are some hair on my lower legs, but very little hair on my arms and thighs. My face is oval, with no visibly square-shaped jaw. I have very little facial hair as well and only need to shave once per 1 or 2 weeks. I have small but natural boobs, turner scale 3. They are sensitive, and could bring me to quite pleasurable multiple small orgasms without my ever touching my penis. I wear male clothes, and present myself as a male and have no dysphoria about it. But sometimes my brain becomes quite feminine, and likes to be treated like a girl socially and sexually. I think I could somehow pass if I wear girls clothes. I don't wear girls clothes though since my puberty. I'm afraid I will feel so sad when looking into the mirror. I might look ugly if I dress like a girl, though I secretly hope to give it try and to look beautiful.

I sexually fantasise anybody who most importantly is discreet, and then with a vagina but with other sexual and/or behavioural traits in between a stereotype male and female. For example, those various nb people, tomboys, drag kings, flat chested girls, post-op mtf transsexuals and non-hairy/shaved ftm transsexuals turn me on.

Because I have been exclusively presenting as a male for a long time since my puberty, I don't even know who would be attracted to me if I present this ""fetish"" side of me. To avoid real life embarrassment, I want to ask here on-line, will people find me attractive? Where could I find such a partner?
",lgbtsex
An interesting title,"So... Me and my partner always try out different sex positions.... And recently he was ontop riding , only problem is his ass is bony as heck and it makes my hips sore, any suggestions to remedy this ? ( No silly suggestions like leaving him or some dumb shit )",lgbtsex
Learn more about the ANCHORS Study!,"Research Study for FL Residents! The goal of ANCHORS is to learn more about the alcohol/other substance use and sexual activity of men who have sex with men to inform a new computer-and phone-based intervention that will help to reduce heavy drinking and risky sex. Possible compensation if you are selected to complete a web survey. 

Visit us on the web at www.anchorsresearch. org

Call or text us at 352-214-4047 to learn more!",lgbtsex
Me(f) and my girlfriend(f) can't have orgasms with each other. Help?,"So we've been together now for around 6 months, and while the sex is good (actually is pretty great, better than I've had with anyone else and I can feel pretty intense things that I've never felt by masturbating)  no matter how good things are we can never reach orgasm. 

I'm not sure if I conditioned myself (is that even possible?) to reach orgasms only in the way I masturbate (stimulating my clitoris), but when I'm masturbate I can reach fairly quickly, like in a minute if I'm already aroused. While she doesn't like direct stimulation on the clit and says she takes much more time and masturbates much less frequently than I.

We're both in our mid twenties with little sexual experience before each other. Actually I've never orgasmed with my other partners and she only did a couple times in her previous long term relationship. 

Also, we live with our parents, so it's always a bit uncomfortable to have sex at home in a twin bed. We're both suffer for anxiety and we've talked about how we feel too self conscious when we think we are taking too long to come and therefore making the other tired (even though we both don't mind waiting). For me at least is a bit hard to concentrate sometimes specially when she's eating me out or in a position we're not so close. I think is easier for both of us to give pleasure to the other than to receive it. 

I guess I may have provided too much information, but I just wanted to make the specifics clear. Does anyone has any advice or experienced the same thing? I always see those articles about how lesbians have so much more orgasms than straight women but I kinda feel left out of all the hype.",lgbtsex
Am I bi?,"I am a female and am 22. I’ve always identified as straight but I’ve fantasized doing things with girls, more and more so recently. I’m unsure if I’m bisexual or what this may mean. I’m curious to see how it’d feel like to hook up with a girl but unsure how to go about that. My friends told me to go on Tinder to find a girl to hook up with and try it out...is this a good way of exploring? ",lgbtsex
My wife suggested I sleep with other men again.,"Hi, everyone!  I’m a man in his early thirties, and my wife and I have been in a monogamous relationship for about 6 years (we have kids together, too). We are both bisexual, and she knows about my past  sleeping with men. In fact, she has always found it really hot. She recently suggested that I start sleeping with guys again. I’ve never had emotional attachments to other men, which is one of the reasons why she’s cool with it (and indeed was the one to bring it up). 

We started discussing some preliminary rules about what this arrangement would look like - never bring guys back to our house, always play safe, no more than a few times with the same guy, nobody that we know, etc. In general, completely open and honest communication. 

Does anyone have experience with this kind of arrangement?  Any other rules to consider? And how do I go about this?  When I was sleeping with guys before, I didn’t have a wedding ring. Would that complicate things? Would that be a turn-on / turn-off?  What’s the best way of going about having safe, nsa gay sex, given my circumstance?",lgbtsex
This organization is selling prostate massagers and sex toys to raise money for prostate cancer,"Saw this in r/sexpostive. Thought it was a cool message and would pass it along :)

https://sextoysformen.co/

https://sextoysformen.co/pages/prostate-cancer-foundation",lgbtsex
Learn more about the ANCHORS Study!,"Research Study for FL Residents! The goal of ANCHORS is to learn more about the alcohol/other substance use and sexual activity of men who have sex with men to inform a new computer-and phone-based intervention that will help to reduce heavy drinking and risky sex. Possible compensation if you are selected to complete a web survey. 

Visit us on the web at www.anchorsresearch. org

Call or text us at 352-214-4047 to learn more!",lgbtsex
THE MOST UNDER-RATED TYPE OF GAY SEX,,lgbtsex
Learn more about the ANCHORS Study!,"Research Study for FL Residents! The goal of ANCHORS is to learn more about the alcohol/other substance use and sexual activity of men who have sex with men to inform a new computer-and phone-based intervention that will help to reduce heavy drinking and risky sex. Possible compensation if you are selected to complete a web survey. 

Visit us on the web at www.anchorsresearch. org

Call or text us at 352-214-4047 to learn more!",lgbtsex
"Research Study Cisgedner heterosexual and Cisgedner homosexual individuals! Master’s in Public Health student looking for (18+, individuals living in the greater New York City Area including Suffolk, Nassau county, Westchester). please help me graduate on time! Many thanks in advance.",,lgbtsex
Learn more about the ANCHORS Study!,"Research Study for FL Residents! The goal of ANCHORS is to learn more about the alcohol/other substance use and sexual activity of men who have sex with men to inform a new computer-and phone-based intervention that will help to reduce heavy drinking and risky sex. Possible compensation if you are selected to complete a web survey. 

Visit us on the web at www.anchorsresearch. org 

Call or text us at 352-214-4047 to learn more!",lgbtsex
Paid relationship education &amp; sexual health program for cisgender male couples :),"Hey! My name is Arielle and I'm a queer researcher and relationship skills coach at Northwestern University. I want to give y'all some info about 2GETHER, a project we have going on for male couples.

2GETHER is a paid research study that involves a relationship education program-- where you and your partner can learn healthy relationship skills like communication, safe sex, and other ways to strengthen your relationship. We have a national online program and an in-person program for people who live in Chicago.

There will be follow-up surveys and free at-home STI testing before and after the 2GETHER program. Because we're a university, all data we collect is protected by IRB and federal regulations. If you and your partner are eligible to take part, you'll see a consent form, which has more info about your privacy rights.

Fun bonus: as a thank you for completing all parts of 2GETHER, each partner will receive $250!

Want to find out if you qualify, or learn more? Check out our eligibility screener: https://redcap.nubic.northwestern.edu/redcap/surveys/?s=YXKMW9JFXY

Even more info on our website: http://2getherstudy.northwestern.edu/
",lgbtsex
Survey on Childhood Gender experiences (18+),"We are seeking adults to complete an online survey about different childhood experiences, particularly those relating to gender. Your participation will help us to develop a new questionnaire. We will also investigate associations between different childhood gender-related experiences and adult sexual orientation, gender identity and mental health. For more details and to take part please visit: https://www.surveymonkey.co.uk/r/childgender5 
",lgbtsex
Learn more about the ANCHORS Study!,"Research Study for FL Residents! The goal of ANCHORS is to learn more about the alcohol/other substance use and sexual activity of men who have sex with men to inform a new computer\-and phone\-based intervention that will help to reduce heavy drinking and risky sex. Possible compensation if you are selected to complete a web survey. 

Visit us on the web at www.anchorsresearch. org

Call or text us at 352\-214\-4047 to learn more!",lgbtsex
HIV Testing,"Wierd Question. I was tested for HIV for the first time ever a couple days ago. The person who gave me the test told me it's a 90 Day test. As soon as the test concluded, he gave me the results. After I walked out, the clinician told me I won't know the results until later, and that they'd call me.

The logical deduction is that the person who administered the test was incorrect, and I have to wait.

Why would he have gave me the results right away?

Should I trust these people for giving me an accurate result, if they actually come in?",lgbtsex
I Started A Petition for a Better Sexual Education In our Public High Schools Inclusive of LGBTQ relationships,,lgbtsex
Why some trans people don’t date cis people,,lgbtsex
LGBTQ+ Cancer Screening Survey (Anonymous)," Hi everyone

I'm a medical student working in the Radiation Oncology department at Thomas Jefferson University in Philadelphia. Our team, led by Dr. Nicole Simone, is fighting to reduce barriers to quality health care outcomes in the LGBTQ\+ community.

At the moment, we're interested in investigating how barriers such as cost and stigmatization may cause patients to forgo or delay vital health care treatments or cancer screening guidelines. **In short, we want to better understand how equitable, fair healthcare results can be best obtained for those in the LGBTQ\+ community.**

\-\-\-

If you have a bit of time, we'd love for you to fill out the attached short survey!

[https://isley.kcc.tju.edu/redcap/surveys/?s=7PX3XLPMMW](https://isley.kcc.tju.edu/redcap/surveys/?s=7PX3XLPMMW)

**The survey is entirely confidential** and there is no identifiable material included in it.

\-\-\-

Thank you!",lgbtsex
How to have lesbian sex first time?,What's it like and how to go about it? I am still unsure what direction I'm going in sexual wise but if I were to be with a female I need to know basics. I am 25f and a virgin..tbh I'm afraid of penetration and I have never used a tampon because of this...it's a big deal and scary area for me..the whole sex thing. I need to know what to expect if I have a gf one day..how to go down and what to do and how to know if I have found right spot etc,lgbtsex
Learn more about the ANCHORS Study!,"Research Study for FL Residents! The goal of ANCHORS is to learn more about the alcohol/other substance use and sexual activity of men who have sex with men to inform a new computer\-and phone\-based intervention that will help to reduce heavy drinking and risky sex. Possible compensation if you are selected to complete a web survey. 

Visit us on the web at: www.anchorsresearch. org

Call or text us at 352\-214\-4047 to learn more!",lgbtsex
"Seeking PARTICIPANTS for an ONLINE STUDY on the experience of unexplained ANAL PAIN during sexual activity [Graduate Student Research, Queen's University] :XPost /r/lgbt",,lgbtsex
I [30m] realized I’m fetishizing people. I want to stop but not sure how.,"I have a thing (fetish?) for big bear men. It comes from a whole history of abuse and daddy issues. I’ve been working it out with a psychologist. Short story here is being with a bear fills a need in me that I’ve had since I was a child, specifically re: safety, protection and affection from bigger men. 

The other day I saw someone in the street who I had previously messaged online. I was so embarrassed. I realized I treated him and everyone else online (apps) like objects to fill my own need. Not in a rude or mean way, but clearly in a “I’m only interested in taking to you because you look hot, and have no interest in you as a human being” way. 

Seeing the dude in the street without a context of hooking up sort of snapped me into remembering that he’s a person too. 

I feel really bad. How do I get myself out of this mode of always thinking of people as ways to fill my sexual needs? Easy answer is bars/meeting people in person but honestly I’m very shy and that’s not easy for me. I need the apps. 

I feel like a horrible human being right now. ",lgbtsex
Struggling to have sex with my boyfriend due to height difference,"Okay so I am very inexperienced with dating guys. I'm in my first real gay relationship now and we have a great time. We perform oral and mutual masturbation a lot. And he can bottom of he gets on top of me. 

However he cannot top me. We have tried many different positions. He said he has never been with anyone as tall as me. I'm 6'5 and he is about 5'6. 

Has anyone ever been in this situation? What position helped? 

Thanks",lgbtsex
8 reasons on why you should date a girl!,,lgbtsex
"Seeking LGBT storytellers in Portland, OR","Hello /r/lgbtsex folks!

I am one of the producers of [The Mystery Box Show](http://www.mysteryboxshow.com), a live sex-themed storytelling series based in Portland, Oregon. (think ""The Moth"" but with more adult themes)

We're always looking for new storytellers to feature on our stage, and we would love to cast our net into the /r/lgbtsex community! Our goal is to cover as many sexual experiences as possible: from vanilla to kinky, across any conceivable spectrum of sexuality, gender, identity... As long as the story has good emotional stakes, or a surprising turn, or is simply unique in an unexpected way, it is likely a great fit for our show.

If you or anyone you know sound like a good candidate for what we do, we would love to hear from you.

Please feel free to ask any questions you have in this thread or in a private message. I would be happy to provide any information I can. 

Thank you for your time, and I look forward to hearing from all of you!
",lgbtsex
Learn more about the ANCHORS Study!,"ANCHORS Study for Florida Residents! This study was designed especially for men who have engaged in sexual activity with other men. Possible compensation if you are selected to complete a web survey to provide information for a new intervention. Visit us at www.anchorsresearch. org, call or text us at 352-214-4047 to learn more.",lgbtsex
New Gay Kink Discord,"Hey guys \- I noticed a lot of people were asking for a gay BDSM Discord server and there wasn't really any good ones out there that I could find so I got this set up for everyone. Come join and mingle!

[https://discord.gg/e8NWUZD](https://discord.gg/e8NWUZD)",lgbtsex
Are queer women better at breakups?,"I'm a writer with VICE's LGBT section working on a piece about why queer women are generally better at breakups than straight people. Do you agree? Why do you think that is?

If anyone's interested in chatting or commenting, I'd love to get some feedback that I can include in the piece (can totally be anonymous if you like.)",lgbtsex
Learn more about the ANCHORS Study!,"ANCHORS Study for Florida Residents! This study was designed especially for men who have engaged in sexual activity with other men. Possible compensation if you are selected to complete a web survey to provide information for a new intervention. Visit us at www.anchorsresearch. org, call or text us at 352-214-4047 to learn more.",lgbtsex
Am i in risk?,"Hi! I dont really post in reddit, but decided to raise this question, although I'm sorry if it is the old question, Am i at risk? 

I had fun with my bf last night, and the only thing I know is that he was a rather adventurous guy, but he said he was tested negative last November. I am not sure but I think he had some sex too between November and now. 

I did use condom when I started it, but at the ending of the session I stupidly decided to take it off and insert it raw. This only last for 3-5min before I pull it off out of STD scare. so I did not cum too inside of him.

I am now concerned whether i am at risk of being infected, if god forbid he is positive unknowingly. Thanks! And pls advise me as I am very nervous, and it is too early to take test now for me, and 1 PEP treatment costs $2k at where I am (28days). 

Have a great day!",lgbtsex
Learn more about the ANCHORS Study!,"Research Study for FL Residents! The goal of ANCHORS is to learn more about the alcohol/other substance use and sexual activity of men who have sex with men to inform a new computer-and phone-based intervention that will help to reduce heavy drinking and risky sex. 

Possible compensation if you are selected to complete a web survey. Visit us on the web at www.anchorsresearch.org, call or text us at 352-214-4047 to learn more! ",lgbtsex
Girls Flirting In College . Yummy,,lgbtsex
Regular Sex Does the Body Good,,lgbtsex
Learn more about the ANCHORS study!,"ANCHORS (Advancing New Computer-based Help On Risky Sex) Study for FL Residents! This study was designed especially for men who have engaged in sexual activity with other men. Possible compensation if you are selected to complete a web survey to provide information for a new intervention. Visit us at
www.anchorsresearch .org, call or text us at 352-214-4047 to learn more",lgbtsex
i wanna touch you,,lgbtsex
"Probably just a vent, but wouldn't mind some perspective and guidance","So, I identify as a straight Male (I don't feel an attraction towards male faces) however I do have a bit of a kinky side that I'm exploring very slowly. 
I've always liked the feel of things in my ass. I've stuck things in there in my younger days for the kink of it but hadn't really had a cock in me until last year. On a particularly horny afternoon I bit the bullet and booked a trans escort on backpage. 
Suffice to say, I was very glad I did. I learned that I loved sucking cock, deep throating and had my first hands free orgasm. I still remember being bent on my knees on a couch and her pounding me from behind while I begged and moaned for her to keep going. I didn't even know where that came from lol
Since then, I've had three more paid encounters with trans escorts but non lasted long enough or was hard enough for me to cum just by anal penetration. 
Now, being that I identify as straight and not quite ready for this side of me to go public, how do I find a partner, preferably trans, that I can have a longer term fwb situation with? I'd rather have some one that can be longer term so I can suck them bareback and taste their cum (safety, I'm a bit paranoid) Another side of it is the trust. As I also fantasise about being really used and dominated, which i think I'd be comfortable with someone I trust than an escort. 
Another thing is being able to explore kinks I have. Things like being in an MMF where the other guy fucks me as I fuck the girl, being watched while getting fucked etc. How does one get in to these circles? I've tried on redhotpie for a while but must be doing something wrong as I'm yet to have any success. 
Thanks in advance. 
I'm from Melbourne Australia btw. ",lgbtsex
"Are most girls bisexual, or at least bi-curious?","Around 85% girls are exclusively bisexual and only 2% girls are heterosexual?

I have read some questions and answers on GAG.

1. Why do ""straight"" girls make out with each other?

2. Are there any straight girls not aroused by girls?

3. Girls, have you or will you ever eat another girls pussy?

4. Are there any straight girls not aroused by girls?

5. Girls, have you or will you ever eat another girls pussy?

6. Would you let another girl eat you out?

7. Girls, would you let another girl lick your pussy if you were REALLY horny and they offered?

8. Straight people! are the private parts of the same sex gross for you to touch?

Majority of girls say they enjoy it and girls give better oral then guys even girls lips are lickerish than guys lips that's why they feel crazy while kissing/making out with girls. Smell of pussy amuse them even eating pussy for them as like strawberries. I don't understand how can a straight girl say this.

(For minutes at a time! Heterosexual people don't enjoy making out with each other, and don't say experimenting, if you want to experiment with your own gender like that, you have some degree of sexual attraction to them, why do these girls consider themselves straight though after frenching another girl?)

Beginning to believe when guys say there is no such thing as a straight women.

I would puke by the idea of kissing a guys's penis and it gross me out. It repulse me. I will get the feelings like nausea.

But if women are suppose to be straight why they are not opposed to having sexual thing with another woman or why same sex intimacy doesn't repulse them. Are women by default receptive to have sex with anything and repulsion doesn't work?",lgbtsex
[Rant] Please help my friend get his picture back in the yearbook and a chance to walk on the stage at graduation!(Crosspost from r/LGBTeens),,lgbtsex
Contribute to inclusive sexual health research at Queen's University! Participants 18+ needed. Prize draws available.,"The Sexual Health Research Laboratory at Queen's University is seeking individuals of all gender expressions and sexual orientations to participate in an anonymous online questionnaire. The goal of this research is to better understand the sensations that individuals experience during sexual arousal. **We are currently looking for individuals who do not experience sexual difficulties to complete an online questionnaire.**

**Participants must be 18 years of age or older, and be able to read and write in English.** Completion of online questionnaires asking about bodily sensations and sexual functioning will take approximately 30 to 45 minutes, and we are offering entry in a prize draw as a thank you for your participation.

**TO PARTICIPATE Please visit: https://queensu.qualtrics.com/jfe/form/SV_0lgRBYquI5a46LX**

This research project is supervised by Dr. Caroline Pukall (Department of Psychology), and is approved by the Queen’s University General Research Ethics Board.

For more information about the Sexual Health Research Lab, please visit: http://sexlab.ca

Thank you!",lgbtsex
My friend and I have just released a new podcast episode about trans dating with a couple of trans folk discussing our experiences! It might be up your alley?,,lgbtsex
Do dildos just not feel as good as the real thing?,"I've always tried to use dildos for anal stimulation, it feels ok but not great. Enough to where I can get off. Recently though, I had sex with a man for the first time and it felt amazing (too bad he popped too early). Now that I have the comparison, using dildos is just uncomfortable. No matter how much lube I use, the size, positioning, everything. It's still uncomfortable. It's not like I can just sleep with guys all the time lol! I have a girlfriend, so it's why I tried a strapon and it's ok, but not great. So is this just me? Or is there anything I can do to make it feel better?",lgbtsex
Prostate massager makes me feel sick,"Hello!

I [just got this](https://www.amazon.com/PHANXY-Upgraded-Vibrating-Rechargeable-Waterproof/dp/B074K3B63K/ref=sr_1_1_s_it?s=hpc&amp;ie=UTF8&amp;qid=1520205458&amp;sr=1-1&amp;keywords=prostate+sex+massager), and I wanted to try and have a prostate-only orgasm. So I drenched the thing in lube (I mean, lube got all over the table), since I wanted to be safe with my first time using a new toy (I also have a [Paloqueth dildo](https://www.amazon.com/Realistic-Ultra-soft-Beginners-Hands-free-Flexible/dp/B06XSZ5F9V/ref=sr_1_1_s_it?s=hpc&amp;ie=UTF8&amp;qid=1520206727&amp;sr=1-1&amp;keywords=paloqueth+dildo)).

However, unlike the dildo, after a few minutes of use my stomach started to get really upset, and now I feel like vomiting.

Is this normal at all? Do some people have this experience?",lgbtsex
Can a wear a buttplug to sleep?,"I plan on wearing a buttplug when I go to sleep and most likely during the day after. My biggest question is, is it safe?? I’m into exploring and want to try new things. I have a plug I’ve used before and I’m totally comfortable with the size and I’ve worn it throughout a day with breaks in between before. 

One of my biggest concerns in the lube. I don’t have access to special anal lube so I use olive oil. I know, while it sounds wierd, I’ve used it with my plugs and toys for over a year and it works perfectly, with no odd or painful affects. My main point is that I want to know if it’s okay to use for a long period of time (8ish hours/ throughout the night) because other pages say you need an oil based lube with a non porous toy. My toy is covered it wood gloss- the same thing you’d see on a shiny kitchen table. Again, it sounds  wierd, but I’ve used the wooden toy with olive oil throughout a day multiple times for almost 8 months now, it’s totally good for me. So for that, are those materials safe?

Also, is it medically safe? Will it cause damage to the skin/anus? Will it only stretch the sphincters/anus out? Advice from experienced people would be great, and I’m male if it makes anything different. Thanks ",lgbtsex
Am I asexual?,"So I’m totally turn on by gay porn and sex. 

Whenever I try to invision myself having sex, I get depressed. I can’t see myself every having sex. 

There’s a guy I love. He finally sent me nudes and I just got completely turned off. When drunk I want nothing more than to be fucked by him. When sober I don’t want any sexual things with any person. 

I feel unattractive, I feel like I won’t satisfy anyone. I just want to jack off and not deal with sex anymore. ",lgbtsex
"How gay men use recreational drugs, is it related to how they think other men on the gay scene see them?",,lgbtsex
To shave or not to shave,"Title pretty much sums this up.
I’m a gay guy that loves giving and receiving oral sex 
My question is to guys that have actually actual given oral to other guys (I want actual opinions not preconceptions from virgins (no offence)) do you prefer that the guy you’re giving oral be shaven or does it not matter to you?

I’ve been with a couple guys that have given oral to me (mostly to edge me before they put their dick in) and one said that they’d prefer I was shaven and only sucked my dick (he’d asked before if he could eat my ass)
But the other one went straight to licking my ass like the hair didn’t make a difference.

Sorry if that’s tmi but I’m really curious, I can get rid of it if it’s better for you guys but if you don’t care then it’s not worth the effort ",lgbtsex
How to be more careful with anal play?,"i should prolly write this under a throaway but im lazy lolll

So i'd say im pretty experienced with anal, and I know that I have a high pain tolerance. I have a tendency to hurt myself and go to fast when left to my own devices. I recently got a smaller toy because my other ones are too big and I end up forcing them (I had no problem when I was younger? idk)

Anyways last weekend I decided to smoke a little weed and play with my new smaller toy. I figured weed would help me relax. I dunno if it did, but I eventually relaxed and probably used the small toy for around forty minutes. (I don't think i've ever used a toy that long before) And eventually I wanted to use the bigger one and it felt fine. I used lots of lube the whole time, and I ended up playing for about an hour and I started to realize my ass felt sore/raw. Now for the past week since then my ass has been more sore than I've ever experienced and it freaked me out. I don't know what I did wrong. Did I not realize I wasn't using enough lube? Is it not safe to use a toy for that long?

If anyone has any advice lmk lol.",lgbtsex
Sexual Experiences Survey,"This is a University of British Columbia study being conducted on Sexual Victimization. The principle investigator for this study is Jan Cioe, Psychology Department, University of British Columbia, Okanagan, (jan.cioe@ubc.ca). The co-investigators are Larissa Just, Psychology Department, University of British Columbia, Okanagan (ljust@mail.ubc.ca), Crystal Munday, Psychology Department, University of British Columbia, Okanagan (crystalmundy@alumni.ubc.ca), and Evanya Musolino, Psychology Department, University of British Columbia, Okanagan (evanya.musolino@ubc.ca). The following study will compare characteristics of men and women who are more susceptible to sexual coercion. Participation is restricted to those residing in North America, who are fluent in English and can read at a Grade 7 level, and who are 18 years of age or older. Please click on the following link to proceed to the study: https://survey.ubc.ca/surveys/37-bbe6107b7344fd9dad1b323bc9d/sexual-victimization/",lgbtsex
Thoughts on this Beautiful Transgender Couple,,lgbtsex
Sexual Experiences Survey,"This is a University of British Columbia study being conducted on Sexual Victimization. The principle investigator for this study is Jan Cioe, Psychology Department, University of British Columbia, Okanagan, (jan.cioe@ubc.ca). The co-investigators are Larissa Just, Psychology Department, University of British Columbia, Okanagan (ljust@mail.ubc.ca), Crystal Munday, Psychology Department, University of British Columbia, Okanagan (crystalmundy@alumni.ubc.ca), and Evanya Musolino, Psychology Department, University of British Columbia, Okanagan (evanya.musolino@ubc.ca). The following study will compare characteristics of men and women who are more susceptible to sexual coercion. Participation is restricted to those residing in North America, who are fluent in English and can read at a Grade 7 level, and who are 18 years of age or older. Please click on the following link to proceed to the study: https://survey.ubc.ca/surveys/37-bbe6107b7344fd9dad1b323bc9d/sexual-victimization/",lgbtsex
Sociological Research Survey on Sexual Fluidity (college students),"Hey everyone! Please take my survey (if you qualify) so I can graduate! 

Survey Qualifications and Instructions: 
*College Student (Undergrad-Doctoral) 
*18-32 
*100% Anonymous- Please answer as honestly as possible! 
*Survey time: 1-2 min 
*Please note: This is NSFW, so please do not pull it up on your work computers 
*Survey is mobile friendly

EDIT****I HAVE REACHED PAST MY QUOTA OF FEMALE RESPONDENTS, but please note that I still need non-female identifying people to respond****

http://ucf.qualtrics.com/jfe/form/SV_cuU24voaf40Kz0V",lgbtsex
Sexual Experiences Survey,"This is a University of British Columbia study being conducted on Sexual Victimization. The principle investigator for this study is Jan Cioe, Psychology Department, University of British Columbia, Okanagan, (jan.cioe@ubc.ca). The co-investigators are Larissa Just, Psychology Department, University of British Columbia, Okanagan (ljust@mail.ubc.ca), Crystal Munday, Psychology Department, University of British Columbia, Okanagan (crystalmundy@alumni.ubc.ca), and Evanya Musolino, Psychology Department, University of British Columbia, Okanagan (evanya.musolino@ubc.ca). The following study will compare characteristics of men and women who are more susceptible to sexual coercion. Participation is restricted to those residing in North America, who are fluent in English and can read at a Grade 7 level, and who are 18 years of age or older. Please click on the following link to proceed to the study: https://survey.ubc.ca/surveys/37-bbe6107b7344fd9dad1b323bc9d/sexual-victimization/",lgbtsex
I hate my people increasingly,"my people usually seem against non heterosexual sexualities, not the case usually when they are of my religion but often without that religion, the political community they are in is full of toxic people that rather divide people and just the way how cold they act to me for expressing my sexual feelings in a non forceful manner only to tell me it is just degenerate and disgusting only fuels me some misanthropy as well as what others could call internal racism.   Sometimes if I want a genocide, I want it on my own people because they do not know what it means to be a real tribalist if they cannot accept the members that don't have the same sexual feelings, that in many chances a gay person is born and nobody can help that.   

in a sense it is hopeless to kill us all and ironically they will just be killing more of their own for insane reason such as an unhealthy obsession to moral snoop.  They just keep calling me degenerate but I am just not a good boy, I am just not a sheep

I am an individual and I follow nature completely as I should....  they are the ones shitted on by nature, I am shitted on by them.   In a fight to resist the unnatural is certainly natural.   I just wish all these people I am talking about would die a slow painful death for the hate and division they inspire on us when we are hard working good citizens that just has different ways of getting our rocks off.   Seriously one reason I work out, learn what I can, and rid insecurities and fears because I desire so deeply to be above these assholes!   ",lgbtsex
"Me and my sexual health nurse friend have a new podcast about sex ed and our latest episode is on asking for what we want, talking about our needs and understanding ourselves (and queer focused!) NSFW",,lgbtsex
Sexual Experiences Survey,"This is a University of British Columbia study being conducted on Sexual Victimization. The principle investigator for this study is Jan Cioe, Psychology Department, University of British Columbia, Okanagan, (jan.cioe@ubc.ca). The co-investigators are Larissa Just, Psychology Department, University of British Columbia, Okanagan (ljust@mail.ubc.ca), Crystal Munday, Psychology Department, University of British Columbia, Okanagan (crystalmundy@alumni.ubc.ca), and Evanya Musolino, Psychology Department, University of British Columbia, Okanagan (evanya.musolino@ubc.ca). The following study will compare characteristics of men and women who are more susceptible to sexual coercion. Participation is restricted to those residing in North America, who are fluent in English and can read at a Grade 7 level, and who are 18 years of age or older. Please click on the following link to proceed to the study: https://survey.ubc.ca/surveys/37-bbe6107b7344fd9dad1b323bc9d/sexual-victimization/",lgbtsex
Sexual Victimization Study,"This is a University of British Columbia study being conducted on Sexual Victimization. The principle investigator for this study is Jan Cioe, Psychology Department, University of British Columbia, Okanagan, (jan.cioe@ubc.ca). The co-investigators are Larissa Just, Psychology Department, University of British Columbia, Okanagan (ljust@mail.ubc.ca), Crystal Munday, Psychology Department, University of British Columbia, Okanagan (crystalmundy@alumni.ubc.ca), and Evanya Musolino, Psychology Department, University of British Columbia, Okanagan (evanya.musolino@ubc.ca). The following study will compare characteristics of men and women who are more susceptible to sexual coercion. Participation is restricted to those residing in North America, who are fluent in English and can read at a Grade 7 level, and who are 18 years of age or older. Please click on the following link to proceed to the study: https://survey.ubc.ca/surveys/37-bbe6107b7344fd9dad1b323bc9d/sexual-victimization/",lgbtsex
"Participate in research examining sexual relationships, communication, and sexual health from Carleton University!",,lgbtsex
I dont understand what my gf wants,"I made this account for this qwestion. Sorry my english.
Im with my Gf for almost over 1 year. We are in a gay relationship.
The sex was always amazing until like 1 month ago when we had an argument because I dont understand that she wants to please me back.
I always like to please her and im open to anything from soft to BDSM and pleasing her is my pleasure. I consider myself a sexual person. I enjoy it to the core and sometimes it can take a full day of roleplay and anticipation and I feel that from all my partners with her I have the best of my time but she said multiple times that she wants to do something back for me and I always explain that my pleasure is giving her what she needs and in the same time I get what I need. I have an insane imagination and I also write erotic stories and everything that we do just makes that part of my mind fire up so much more and we get along on other parts of life as well. And I realy see har as an important part of my life and her just stoping giving any affection what so ever because I dont understand what she wants makes me wonder if im truly wrong? What am I missing? Or we should end it? Not something that I want tho.",lgbtsex
"Participate in research examining sexual relationships, communication, and sexual health from Carleton University!",,lgbtsex
"Participate in research examining sexual relationships, communication, and sexual health from Carleton University!",,lgbtsex
"Top 10 Most Openly Gay Male Actors in Hollywood (Jake Paul, Wentworth Miller)",,lgbtsex
[NSFW] First time bottom!,"Hey all, I am going to be bottoming for the first time next weekend. There’s a guy that I’ve hooked up a couple of times with for oral and whatnot, but I’ve never been fucked in the ass, and that’s our next step. He’s usually a bottom, but he said he would be willing to be my top. Anyways, I’m just curious about a few things. 

Will it hurt? I’ve been playing with a dildo that’s supposedly 5.5 inches long and really fucking girthy, and he’s 7 inches and pretty girthy. 

Can I be upfront about my fantasies with him? I really want to be dominated and just used like a slut bottom whore. I want to be filled with cum and I want to feel fucking USED when we’re done. After I get used to his cock of course, I want him to slam my ass with his cock, grab my hair, choke me, spank me, call me a bitch, you name it. I also want to call him daddy, even though I think I’m slightly bigger than him stature wise and we’re pretty close in age.

For those of you who are into being dominated, do you ever cum from it? I’d love to have the fun fucked out of me without touching my dick. 

Should I let him bareback me? He says he’s clean, and he has papers to prove it. He will be my first penetrative sex ever, so I’m pretty sure my asshole is clean. Thoughts on barebacking?

Lastly, any recommended positions you’d recommend for my first time to get used to it? I was thinking doggy, or spooning. 

Thanks guys!",lgbtsex
A Gay Christmas Tale,,lgbtsex
Funny Gay Commercials,,lgbtsex
Anything You Do With A Girl Is Not Gay,,lgbtsex
"FTM coordinator from MI, I need some help.","Hey every one my name is Kyle I am the FTM coordinator for the state of Michigan and a non-profit group called Transgender Michigan; TGMI was started by a woman named Rachel Crocker who also started the transgender day of visibility about 20 years ago. Rachel put me in a unique position to represent transmen all over the state and talk to hundreds of people just in my first 6 months in the role. I have really enjoyed meeting every one and getting people started on their transitional journeys; part of my job is to collect and screen resource information and pass on the good bits to every one else. 
I am now in a position to take the next step in my journey and I am finally asking for help and support from the community that has become my family, I wanted to share a bit about myself in hopes that you will ask about the link to my documentation on FB so I can share my story and spread the word about Transguys like myself. 
https://www.facebook.com/donate/164081024190383/
https://www.facebook.com/kylestransitionftm/?ref=bookmarks

I am raising money to help cover the cost of a double mastectomy and post operation care. I want to tell you a bit about myself and why this means so much to me. I was born and raised on a small town farm, I grew up strong willed, with a hard working attitude and a big heart. My grandpa taught me to always grow more food than you need because one day your neighbor will be hungry, and my grandma taught me how to cook as only a farmer's wife could. At 12 I started thinking I was a lesbian because I didn't have the words or knowledge to discribe myself. At 14 I started to realise that my body was not matching my mind, my mind had always been me but now my body was betraying me and changing in ways that were wrong. I started working to support myself and put my self through high school at 15 when I was kicked out of my dad's house and a year later kicked out of my mom's house for identifying as a lesbian. I bought my own truck and a second hand slider phone and graduated highschool. At 17 I enlisted in the national guard an a Chinook mechanic. For me the military gave me stability and life skills; I learned how to deal with a wide variety of people and adapt to sudden problems in a logical manner. I was honorably discharged in 2014 and shortly after moved home to Michigan. Since 2014 I have been working as a construction worker in schools and hospitals and was an asbestos abatement supervisor. I came out as transgender to my family in 2015 and started HRT in 2016. Also in 2016 I was diagnosed with superior mesenteric artery syndrome and cyclical vomiting syndrome which cause me to loose 25 lbs, it made parts of my body shut down on me and has made it difficult to maintain steady work, but i love working with my hands and continue to do maintenance work when its available. My medical team is on board with me moving on to the next step in my medical transition and emotionally I am thrilled at finally being given the go ahead.
Being able to have this surgery would go a long way to helping my mental health. Dysphoria hardly ever gets to me but as I pass all of the time now, still having female breast tissue has finally started wearing me down quite a bit. To look in the mirror every day and feel hatred for myself, to feel the tightness of the binder that I have to put on every day, mentally is very hard and I've been struggling. I want to make my body match my mind so that others see me the way I see myself",lgbtsex
Transgender woman says she doesn't reveal her past to one night stands - Defiant Deana O’Riordan believes it is none of her conquests’ business what sex she was born,,lgbtsex
smoking and sex drive,"ok so i know that smoking can cause problems in blood flow to the penis,but does smoking decrease sex drive,and hornyness levels?",lgbtsex
Is LGBT sex STDs Safe?,,lgbtsex
I need your help. Conducting a research study for my thesis.,,lgbtsex
What’s the definition of sex? New study aims to find the answer.,,lgbtsex
"Prominent external anal sphincter, possible hemorrhoids/complications from ulcerative colitis. Can't have anal.","Question: Most anuses I've seen (what a phrase) have generally just looked like you've pinched off an icing dispenser. However, mine appears to have some rather obvious musculature surrounding it, like a sphincter, though everything I've read makes it seem like this ""should"" be a bit deeper and not as conspicuous. Does anyone have a similar issue?

Also, basically, I can't have anal. The instant I put anything anywhere near there, even with lube, even with a finger, I get a sensation of intense friction and even burning, similar to if you've ever had a particularly bad experience with Taco Bell. On some instances of defecation this occurs as well, but only when I've got to wipe, a lot. Even with categorically absurd amounts of lube, I can't stand the pain, which isn't so much of a ""he's too big, its stretching"" burn but almost like a contact dermatitis. I do have ulcerative colitis, albeit a minor case, and my ulcerations are nonexistent from being on medication. Could this be hemorrhoids? Or something else. I've been looking for ages to find answers to this problem.",lgbtsex
10 Tips For Safe Anal Douching,,lgbtsex
Crazy Christian Preachers protest Yoga Pants ft. The Young Turks,,lgbtsex
Understanding love across different types of romantic relationships Survey,,lgbtsex
sex &amp; intimacy.. with each other.. poly girlfriends turned best friends &amp; cohosts..,,lgbtsex
Questions about herpes transmission in lesbian relationship,"Hi there. I'm a 25 year old female and have just started a relationship with a similarly aged female, who just told me that she has HSV2, genital herpes. Without further educating myself, I let her finger me (with clean hands) and I didn't let her go down on me, and her pants never came off at any point. 

How worried do I have to be about risks of transmission? For now, we will strictly be doing one sided hand stuff (to me) and her pants will never come off. 

Sorry for such silly questions, theres just not a whole lot of information on this type of stuff for same sex couples.",lgbtsex
"Accepting my bisexuality- a long, complicated process...",,lgbtsex
5 Gays 1 Girl &amp; A Podcast,"Hope you're all well I just wanted to make you aware of a new podcast we've made which celebrates diversity within the LGBT+ community called '5 Gays 1 Girl &amp; A Podcast'. Each week we have a round-table discussion with a primary focus on social and cultural issues/dilemmas and life experiences - basically it's like a gay version of Loose Women/The View! (better than it sounds)

We'd love for you all to have a listen, and let us know what you think - and maybe help us spread the word about the podcast - so please find below some links to where you can listen and our social media channels.

Our first episode was released on Saturday and talks about the minefield world that is dating. (something I'm sure you can all relate to)

Listen Podbean: https://5gays1girl.podbean.com SoundCloud: https://soundcloud.com/5-gays-1-girl-podcast/ iTunes: https://itunes.apple.com/WebObje…/MZStore.woa/…/viewPodcast… Socials: Twitter: @5gays1girlpod Instagram: @5gays1girl Facebook: @5gays1girl

Thanks for reading and we hope you enjoy!

Joel from the 5 Gays 1 Girl &amp; A Podcast Team xx",lgbtsex
Having difficulty using a prostate massager. Need help and advice.,"Just like the title said.  Not getting much in the way of orgasmic stimulation from the vibes.  Just the urge to pee.  I've never done this before so I'm clueless as to what I'm supposed to feel or how I'm supposed to position myself.  

Any advice for a newbie?  ",lgbtsex
I love straight guys,"So, I've always been obsessed with straight men. I just like that alpha male energy. I weight lift so i'm around them all the time. I've been wanting to start my own gay for pay site. I just don't know how to find boys for it. Even if i did, like how do i approach straight guys and how much do I pay them? and like is it even possible? ",lgbtsex
"Diaries of a Sex Researcher – Our bodies, our relationships and our sex lives in the digital age",,lgbtsex
Did i get my period during sex or did she injure me?,"So something weird happened to me the other day and I don't really have anyone to ask about it. Sorry if this is the wrong place to post this... let me know if this is better suited for another sub. (i am a 24 year old gay woman)
I broke up with my girlfriend of 2 years about a month ago, but we hadn't had sex in months prior to breaking up. A couple nights ago, I had casual sex with an acquaintance, and this was the first time I had sex in months. 
After we finished, we noticed that she had blood on her and that there was blood on her sheets. her first concern was that she had hurt me, but I immediately assumed it was my period since I did not feel any pain or discomfort. I was very embarrassed and uncomfortable, as this had never happened to me before and I wasn't expecting my period for another week. 
When I woke up in the morning, the bleeding had totally stopped and I do not in fact have my period. I feel no pain and am just incredibly confused about what could have happened. 

Any insights are appreciated!
",lgbtsex
Ways to stay tight?,"I started seeing this guy a few months ago and the sex has been absolutely incredible. I've never really been a bottom before, but he prefers topping, so I said I would try it. I was initially really nervous because he probably has the largest penis that I've ever seen on a human but, sweet heavens, I just can't get enough. We can't keep our hands off of one another.

He's been out of town for a week visiting his family for summer vacation (he's a grad student). He's going to be gone for a few more weeks. Last night, I was masturbating and started to finger myself and I felt looser than I had in the past.

Does anyone have any thoughts? Is there any way to tighten up/stay tight? A lot of the internet says that things like this are probably just in my head, but I don't know if anyone can confirm that, even if my boyfriend does have an incredibly huge dick. ",lgbtsex
Do y'all scissor?,"Okay I'm feeling really confused now about scissoring. I've heard several people (usually NOT lesbian or bi women) saying that scissoring is fake and that women don't do it when having sex. In cosmo's snapchat story today there's an article about lesbian sex and at the end it says lesbians don't scissor. I don't get it...I've scissored many times before and enjoyed it. So please tell me, have y'all ever scissored? And general thoughts on scissoring but pls only replies from LGBT women thank you",lgbtsex
"How do I break to my parents that I am, and have been since high school, bisexual?","I come from a very southern-oriented family and my dad has always been a little touchy about the LGBT stuff. In high school, I hid my sexuality and numerous of my past dalliances from my parents in fear that he would either freak out or deny it or claim that I was confused. Now that I'm older, out of school and getting into the flow of my life and on the road to having a better relationship with my parents, I really want to tell them the truth. Help?",lgbtsex
how did I tell my girlfriend that I want to dress up as a anime characters when we are have sex,by way i'm a lesbian please help!!!!!,lgbtsex
Being Black AND LGBTQ,,lgbtsex
Why was SEX (Hot Pink) REMOVED from the LGBT Pride Flag???,,lgbtsex
What the hell is my sexual orientation?,"In a nutshell, I'm 22 years old, masculine, not preppy or fem, not sure what my sexuality is and am curious to see what you guys think.

I feel like my sexuality is more complex than the average person. I know people tend to fall somewhere in the middle of gay and straight but with me I feel like it's on a whole other level.

I never really thought about it but during highschool some rumors came out about me and I was labeled queer, fag, and in the closet this really conflicted me and made me start to wonder.

So I am basically going to try and explain this as simple I can and break it down for you guys; I am sexually and emotionally attracted to women, I hope to have a wife and kids some day, when it comes to guys, I am strictly just into sex and have no desire to kiss or cuddle with a man, I don't even think guy's are hot I am just interested in the male genitalia. I mostly perform oral and am not interested in getting bottomed at all. I am actually extremely addicted to giving blowjobs as well as eating out a girl but I find giving head to a guy feels so much more hot.

I have asked my cousin what he thinks and at first it was like no one believed me and the very close people I came out to didn't believed me and thought I was gay in denial. It took them a couple years for them to start saying ""well, it's been all years later and he is still firm about not being gay"" 

Another conflict is I told one of my ex girlfriends one time (bad idea) and basically told me that men can't be bisexual and that i'm using the label bisexual for a stepping stone and will be gay.

What do you guys think? I think I am an unbalanced bisexual or pansexual sense i lean more towards women and am unable to have any sort of emotional connection with men (I have tried).",lgbtsex
Guy dated a guy (for the first time) and now we're broken up and I feel shit,"I'm not good at writing things, and I am trying hard to keep this story shorter than how long it maybe should be.

I (33M) met a guy (32M) while traveling - we were both tourists in a foreign country, and somehow sparks were flying. I don't really date much or have much sex. Too focused on my career and enjoy having lots of friends (without benefits).

I went to visit him in Spain 3 months later. He got out of a 5-year relationship with a girl 6 months beforehand, and I was the first guy he was more emotionally involved with. Now here's the cracker:

I've only ever slept with guys. I don't usually enjoy it, but it can be fun. I've met a girl that I was infatuated with - we never did much (except make out - this was when I was 29), but I masturbated thinking of her for months after she moved away. Couldn't stand the thoughts of being with a guy.

Anyway, I convinced myself that maybe being with a guy was a better option, and - boom. 4 years later I meet this Spaniard.


We spend 6 months together, long distance and I came to visit him 6 times (he visited me twice - he earns A LOT less than me). I realize the 3rd time I went to visit him that the whole sexual aspect was not for me... the more I slept with him, the more I wanted to be with a woman. I cried to my friends and they told me to leave asap. But when I tried to break him the news he said he really cared for me - that's something that no-one has ever said to me, so I decided that there is more to a relationship than sex.

3 months after that I tell him I want to break up and I can't do this anymore. He says he doesn't want to lose me and we both start crying (I know....). So I decide to give it another shot, but I tell him there are some things that need to be handled differently - 2 weeks later some stuff happens back home for which I really needed someone to listen and to provide support, but he is so focused on himself and his own life that I feel completely alone. So I break up with him again.

This time he tells me he loves me and that he will do anything to show me how much I mean to him. So I meet up with him again (outside of Spain) and we spend 2 days together. 6 weeks later he tells me that his feelings for us are getting stronger. 2 weeks later he wants to break up.

The time he wanted to break up coincided with me going through a difficult time where I was figuring things out (on all fronts), and he was also going through a tough patch as his colleague was getting fired (and he has never experienced this in his career). He then says he wants to break up because he realizes that we both lead very different lifestyles (he saw where I lived and met my family many months beforehand) and that I criticized him twice for something that he can't handle. We talked about the item* that I criticized him for BEFORE he asked me to be back together with him, so I was confused why it was brought up again.

It made me so angry... I felt completely misled. Then he says that he wants to be friends and started dating someone (another guy) less than 2 months after we split. That made me even more angry... even if the new guy is a rebound (I don't really care).

So I am confused because:
- All of a sudden I am getting attracted a lot more - from an emotional standpoint - to women;
- I am sad that things went apart so drastically, especially because I feel misled;
- I am trying to re-evaluate what is important in a relationship; isn't it your values? Trust?

I have given up on finding anyone now, because this is just too painful... why can't I just move on as quickly as he has? I travel a lot for work and am often alone; this makes things challenging at times.

Please be nice...


*On several occasions he was glancing over and smiling at girls that were walking past. It made me uncomfortable, because when I once asked him why he wouldn't date one of the beautiful Spanish women, he said ""I can have any woman I want, but I don't want them at the moment"". I would have expected something more along the lines of ""don't worry about the others - I only want to be with you"" (I know, I'm sensitive)",lgbtsex
Probably stupid question regarding STI's,"Hi everyone - so I have really quick (and probably stupid) question regarding the transmission of STI's during gay male sex - if both people are safe of a particular STI (example, HIV) is it still possible for the top to receive a disease if their penis comes into contact with any fecal matter?? Me and my boyfriends both got tested and we're both clean and he really wanted to try anal without a condom but I was a bit afraid to so any advice would be much appreciated

(PS. I've also considered taking PrEP and I was wondering if that was a good safety precaution to take if wanting to perform raw anal)",lgbtsex
New fleshjack toy is painful for me,"I bought the Fleshjack Jack ass endurance, I used it in the bathroom with the shower mount, used a lot of lube on my penis and lube in the toy, I'm uncut btw, as soon as I start fucking it slowly my foreskin automatically pulls back in the toy my sensitive penis head starts to really hurt and remember I used a lot of lube, it didn't feel like a good experience even when I came either, I also own the IceJack crystal clear mouth I've used that twice and it hurts but not as bad as the Jack ass Fleshjack, so why is the toy hurting my penis and the icejack only hurts a little and i've used the IceJack twice, the Vibro fleshjack which I also own I've used about 6 times now and that really hurts ,so I own 3 of the Fleshjack toys and they all hurt and my penis still isn't used to any of the toys why?

I get they aren't the real thing but I kinda don't wanna experience the real thing if it's gonna hurt my penis.",lgbtsex
Sex with best friend.... (f/f),"Hello, I've been friends with my best friend since we were 16 (we are 22 now). I'n not attracted to her or women but I'm curious about sleeping with a woman to see what it's like. My curiosity was brought on because my friend has asked me on three occasion over the years to have a threesome with her. For whatever reason she has chickened out and never brings up why (but has had a threesome with other people). She's come out to be as bisexual and has even had sex with other girls. One Time she drunk texted me and asked "" how much for a threesome"". When I tried to bring it up she got embarrassed and didn't want to talk about it. She seemed to be fine with random sex with people but I don't understand why she gets nervous when it comes to me being involved. My questions is if I should ask her to experiment with me or not? She's my best friend and I feel comfortable with her. I don't want to sleep with some random girl.
",lgbtsex
Mike pence vs the gay storm,,lgbtsex
Looking to interview LGBT/queer folks who have genital herpes or a partner with genital herpes,"Hi there :) I'm currently working on a paper for one of my university classes. I'm writing about disclosing one's HSV status to partners and I have to interview some people for the paper. I have GHSV1 myself so I'll be interviewing my partner about the experience of having someone disclose it to him, but I'd like to hear other people's experiences as well, either hearing the news or disclosing it yourself. I'd also be interested in interviewing a sexual educator or someone who is knowledgeable about the topic.

I'm particularly interested in interviewing LGBTQ women and/or people of color, but I'll gladly interview anyone who is comfortable with it!

I suspect the interview would take about 30-60 minutes and would be conducted over the phone or Skype (or in person if you happen to be in the SF Bay Area). I'm willing to discuss some sort of compensation for your time as well.

If you or your partner would be available for me to interview, please send me a message! Thanks!",lgbtsex
Somebody help me figure out what direction I need to go here. ? NSFW ?,"Sooooo....I've never opened up about this, so here goes nothing.  I'm really struggling to find my place sexually.  I love Women, god do I love them.  I love to look at them, touch them, well you get the idea.  One of the hottest things I can think of at this very moment, is looking down at my nicely manicured hands touching all over a beautiful woman.  That said, I'm not afraid of a dick, they're pretty fun, and honestly, I enjoy a dick in me every now and then, and have thoroughly enjoyed the few blow jobs I've given too, (the look of pleasure on his face when you swallow.....mmmmm.....) but I don't find guys attractive and frankly, it takes a pretty special one for me go for it.  All sounds pretty normal so far ya.....Run of the mill BI?  I love looking pretty, I get my nails done (love bright colors, especially on my toes :-)), wear cute panties, like posting pics that are sexy and just a little provocative, but never full body shots.  I try to stay in shape and love putting on sexy dresses and outfits and I love sexy shoes too (yes, sexy heels). 
Here's where it gets a little weird.....

I'm a guy.  I don't mean like a mistakable guy, but a pretty decent looking (I think) guy.  I have a job that most would associate with generally manly things (I work in the auto recovery and transportation industry) I get greasy and dirty and I'm not afraid to (I do hate it when it fucks up my nails though lol) and I wear a work uniform.  Most of my coworkers chuckle about my choice of bright colored socks and a few have asked me if I do my nails, but even my friends here at work don't know that in private I enjoy being a pretty damn passable hottie (again, personal opinion)  I don't get to go out much, since I've never told anyone, so it's usually reserved for Halloween/dress up occasions and I have been hit up EVERY SINGLE TIME I've gone out in public (again, not many), until I talk, then its usually ""oh my god, I would've never known if you hadn't said something"".  I've heard people say that a lot of people who cross dress actually like the sex that they dress as, but here's the thing.  I don't want to DRESS like a hottie, I want to BE a hottie.  I enjoy playing with my dick (honestly, I do it a lot, this is also another activity that is super fun when my nails are done and it's a female hand stroking my cock EXACTLY how I like it!), but most times I hate it.  It gets in the way, It touches the toilet seat when I sit down,  It makes it so hard to wear cute panties without looking like I have a dick!  I like the way it feels sometimes, but I also long to feel it inside me.  And the balls,  Fuck them.  Panties or not I would give those up.  Can I sell them?  Donate them?  Seroiusly those fuckers are obnoxious.  

So help me out here, because I'm really struggling with where I fit in to the spectrum.  I'm down for a BI adventure every now and then, but really, I want to be a chick, who is into chicks...  Opinions?  Any other guys like me?  Girls like me?  What do you think?  

TL/DR  I want to be a lesbian, but I have a penis and it's getting in the way of things.  haha",lgbtsex
I want to be a bottom but I'm having numerous problems. I need some help. [Gay Anal],"I posted to /r/sex but I want more and different inputs on this. 

As the title suggests, I want to be a bottom but everything is just working against me. Everything's on the table, I'm gonna get into all of the details. 

I've been dating this guy for a little over a month, and we've fooled around, handjob/blowjob stuff, but we both want to get to anal. 

Before I was dating, I would occasionally play with myself in the shower. Fingering myself and all of that. I would also give myself enemas in the shower because I don't like doing anything down there when I'm dirty. 

But the problem is that I'll do stuff in there, and get decently far inside myself, but it's never really felt great. It feels like reverse pooping, really. I didn't enjoy it.

My boyfriend and I wanted to try anal, and though I was sure that someone else doing it would be different, it just felt the same. He fingered me to start off, and I didn't really enjoy it. It's just not a good feeling. He also rimmed me and..that just didn't really feel like anything. It just feels like I'm wiping but with a tongue, as strange a comparison that is. It's not totally unpleasant, but I'm definitely not going to ejaculate, and I didn't really get hard.

My boyfriend tried sticking his dick in, but I was just way too tight and there was no way it was gonna fit. I might have not been relaxed enough, because when I'm by myself in the shower, I can fit four fingers, which is a little bit smaller than my boyfriends dick but similar. 

I wish I could enjoy it but I just don't. I wonder if having a penis there instead of a finger will feel better, but I've started to have doubts. I've always considered myself a bottom, but I guess it's just not what I thought it would be. But I still really want to try. 

Everyone (well, at least most gays) consider anal to be great. And bottoms have to enjoy it for a reason, right? So what am I doing wrong? 

I'd appreciate help if anyone has experience with this. I just don't get it.",lgbtsex
I am a Bi Bottom.....sounds strange too me,"Hey,
I am a 24 year old bi guy. I am submissive with guys. Love the act off being a bottom. I am vers but fight for the bottom lol Just like what I like I guess. Makes me ashamed thouhg because I grew up in a homophobic family that did bottom shaming. Took me my whole life why I was attracted to guys. Guess I know why lol I never been with a girl. SO I guess I am just gay? I am attracted to women and had crushes. Just felt uncomfortable with my sexuality. I honestly just want to get with a girl and see if I am bi. I just feel weird. I am a 6'3 bottom and masc bottom. I don't really like labeling myself but I guess its easier to understand. I love dating guys but wish women would give me a chance. I get put in the friend zone or they get uninterested in me when I tell a girl I am interested in I am bi. Sorry for the rambling. I feel out of place because I just came out not ot long ago and just barely became sexually active. ",lgbtsex
Failed Seduction,"So me [19 M] and my partner [23 M] we're making corn dogs for dinner last night. Now, I was feeling really horny and kinda dominant, and was waiting for a moment where I could do a sex. So while placing the corn dogs in the oven, he notices my boner and pokes it, proceeding to say ""Looks like there's a corn dog outside of the box!"" and I shit you not, I lost all interest. I was dying laughing but that line ruined the mood for being so awful. But we fucked around after all. So my question for you guys is what's the worst pickup line or seduction story your partner used?",lgbtsex
Wondering if I'm just a lesbian in denial,"I am a 21 year old girl who has had minimal relationship experience, given that I'm naturally very introverted and avoidant of commitment. I like to be independent and was always worried that relationships could take away a lot of my personal freedom because I like to have a lot of alone time. As a teenager I thought I was beginning to understand myself but I've only gotten more confused at this point.
I've had crushes on boys before, but whenever the possibility of a relationship came up I'd always back out because it never felt right for some reason. I used to think maybe I was asexual. I've never had a crush on a girl before, but at this point I'm wondering if any of my crushes could be considered normal. Usually if I had a crush I would get extremely nervous and even uncomfortable. I was molested by an older man as a child so maybe it was just a subconscious fear of men or something? It's weird because I'm totally comfortable around guys, it's just when I start to think that they're interested in me in a sexual way I get uncomfortable.
Last year I was in a rough spot because of my anxiety and got involved with a man I worked with because he convinced me he cared about me. He always acted nice to me and I was always uncomfortable around him and he told me he could tell I'd been hurt and that he could take care of me. And I believed him, and he turned out to be very manipulative and abusive and once I got out of that situation I haven't been able to look at men the same way, which has led to this confusion about my sexuality.
When we were together, I felt no sexual attraction to him at all. When we had sex, I always had to get myself off, and it would frustrate him. Sometimes sex was really uncomfortable for me. Now that I'm away from him, I'm coming to terms with the fact that maybe I could be gay? The porn that I watch and enjoy is always girls... it's always the girl I pay attention to. But I've never felt romantic feelings towards women in general.
Maybe someone out there has had similar experiences? Thanks in advance",lgbtsex
Tail plugs,"Why were we not born with tails? I always thought they looked sexy and fun, especially horse / pony tails. Who makes the nicest? I love the Huse design that uses a 90 degree elbow to  loft the tail in an inviting curve instead of letting it hang limply. Its only shortcoming is the thinness of the tail itself. That's unfortunately true of most of the others, so Huse loses minimal points. Fuller, longer, fluffier tails would be so much sexier. Too much hair would be almost enough. ",lgbtsex
Handsfree dildo?,"Hey, so I wasn't sure how to title this question. I'm a bi man. 

So I have a dildo which I love using. I've stuck it to the floor and rode it there, I've stuck it to my headboard and backed myself into it doggystyle, but I'm kind of looking for a way in which it can go in and out of me, without my help (if that makes sense). I want it to fuck me. 

Now, before you suggest either going out and getting a real guy to fuck me, I don't want to. I'm also not keen to go out and spend hundreds of dollars on a sex machine thing. I just want to be able to feel what it's like to get fucked without having to meet someone. 

Can anyone recommend any good techniques/ways to use a dildo for this? Thanks",lgbtsex
Can't maintain stamina with a strap-on,"So, my gf and I are somewhat kinky, and she's typically the more dominant one out of the two of us, so she likes to fuck me with a strap-on, and she can make me climax multiple times, and fucks until she's literally dripping with sweat. 

However, sometimes I fuck her with a strap-on, and I think I make her climax sometimes. Sometimes, though, I lose stamina right as she's about to cum, and have to slow down a bit to catch my breath. A similar thing also happens when we use dildos, because my arm cramps up or starts to get tired, so I have to switch, so sometimes she finishes herself off with the dildo.

One important thing I think it's important to mention is that we both understand that climaxing isn't the end goal, but rather a happy side effect of us having sex. So the issue isn't that we can't climax, but rather that I would like to be able to give her the hard, fast fucking that she gives herself.

Does anyone have any suggestions for good positions or toys that would help me do that?",lgbtsex
Returning after *long* hiatus,"Girlfriend of 10 years passed away, been a year, just starting to return to circulation. Have had strong mm desires for as long as I can remember, which I suppressed for the duration of our relationship. No longer a worry. Starting to explore again. Picked up again with an old friend. Loving every minute of it. Feel like I can't get enough after going so long without.

Is it normal after an extended break to go at it like a starving man at an all you can eat buffet? Anyone been through similar who can relate?",lgbtsex
How old where you when you had your first sexual encounter?,"By sexual encounter I mean blowjobs, fingering, etc. ",lgbtsex
"Bisexual transguy, unsure of ability to appeal to people of any sex.","This is mostly just a post about having low self-esteem, I guess, but I have a hard time imagining that any men or women would ever be into me because no matter what, I don't have the equipment downstairs that they would desire from a sexual partner. I also struggle with the fact that I am partial to penetrative sex, which I feel could be a problem if I were ever to find a woman who wanted to be in a relationship with me. Has anyone out there overcome similar issues? Looking for any insight and/or advice, really. ",lgbtsex
Feeling confused with my sexuality.,"Ive never talked about it, but lately ive notcied ive been attracted to Transwomen(sometimes men)  as well as straight women. I find myself wanting to expiriment with someone who also has male parts? Idk these feelings are all new to me so im not quite sure how to express it. Im 22 male. Has anyone gone through this? I dont know anyone irl i can ask about it.",lgbtsex
I can't climax with my partner.,"I've had sexual encounters with 6 guys now (is it bad that I'm starting to lose count? lol) all the ones before # 6 were mostly meaningless. some failed LTRs, some casual encounters. None of them before #6 I had intimate moments with more than once. I've also never cum with a partner present. only alone. I really like my newest guy. I know it hurts his feelings when I don't cum. Anyone have advice for me? *FORMATTED VERSION IN COMMENTS!* *EXPERIENCING TECHNICAL DIFFICULTIES!*  
- I've abstained from masturbating for a week now, hoping if I stopped that I would be able to do it for him. still, haven't climaxed. 
- I take add medication, and I've been told Adderall can lead to sexual dysfunction. However, I had this issue before I started those meds.
- I'm MtF, pre hrt (1st appointment is on the 22nd! so excited!) I've been so busy lately I can never show up in drag when I'm with him. He doesn't mind, but I don't feel pretty and that does bug me a bit when I'm trying to get frisky.
- I've experienced stage fright in a different setting. I do cam shows on the internet sometimes. at first, it was"" really hard or impossible to cum during them. Now I've gotten over that and am able to get in the zone and just do it. I imagine being comfortable with him for a while I may get better but we've had sex 3-4 times now and still no luck 
- he is a bit of a quick shot and is smaller than I'm used to. he isn't able to poke my good spot... I don't wanna blame him though because I don't think that's fair. I just thought it was worth mentioning...
*edit: formatting*",lgbtsex
I'm ashamed of feeling hetero....,"I'm a trans chick, MTF, or at least trying to be. getting a Dr to help me is seemingly impossible. I'm technically bi, but I'm uncomfortable around women so I only pursue men. Sometimes when I'm at home and I need to cum I think about girls and then become ashamed. it is almost like I'm so scared of being slightly masculine, that I can't accept I like women on a sexual level. I know I'm being irrational, you don't have to tell me that being ashamed of lusting for something is not how you be happy. it is how I feel, though. I think I'm like this for a lot of reasons, mommy issues, sister issues, being treated like a freak in high school for my constant unwanted erections... I just feel like the world never wanted me to be with women and made me feel bad whenever I showed interest in one. I'm also scared how epiphanies like that might mean I'm also not transgender. I really want to be a woman, I do. am I scared of realizing I don't want to be a woman? hard to put into words. Am I scared of honest uncertainties disqualifying me from HRT? Am I scared of transitioning and regretting it? I know I like being fem. I know I hate my facial hair, body hair, voice, and lack of vagina. but i'm still scared for some reason...I'm confused, clearly. I need to work through these issues with my therapist.  I'm just sharing because I need this off my chest. If you all think this should be on another subreddit let me know. ",lgbtsex
I wasn’t born strong! – The internal monologue of 7 bisexual woman.,,lgbtsex
NSFW Bisexual and finally let another guy take my anal virginity,I've been stopping short of anal since it seems like most people just say it hurts and it's unenjoyable. Well I loved it. He fucked my ass all night and I'm already looking forward to the next marathon session. Why did nobody tell me it felt so good? I would done it years ago. ,lgbtsex
"Im writing a gay love story where one has a trauma, and scars on his body, does someone who is heartbroken by the sight turn soft?","so I'm someone who has no experience in sex whatsoever , I do know the whole Idea of sex , and hey masturbation and porn exists so yay for me,  to to this question the second problem would be I have no penis to relate
so my question, Im writing a gay love story , both are insanely in love with each other , one has a sexual trauma , was abused in the past too , and its gonna take him a long time to actually have full on sex. but he has alot of scars on his body.

so his lover is kissing him on his body and notices the multiple scars, cigarette burns , cuts also from selfharm... , but he isn't going to be disgusted , but more like very devastated  and heartbroken to the point that he can't think anymore , if the guy is so heartbroken, and so passionately in love  , is it possible that his penis goes soft? like what makes you go soft? or would you be in the moment and forget about it?

as a lesbian I have no idea how gay sex is , so I have no Idea why I started to write about that, maybe gay porn is another option ",lgbtsex
Lesbian threesome?,"My GF and me have been together for 3.5 yrs and we want to try out threesome. We are both afraid that it'll be awkward and generally won't work, what's your advice? Whom should we choose as a third person? Please, share your experience.",lgbtsex
Mounting dildo problems,"I like masturbating anally with a dildo, but I can't find things to mount the dildo to. When I'm in the shower, I mount it to the tiles and it kind of holds. The problem is when I use it in my room. What can i mount it to? What examples do you people use? Also what lube is best? I'm currently using coconut oil, its ok, but it tends to absorb a bit. ",lgbtsex
New ways to help girlfriend with grinding?,"My girlfriend gets most aroused when we're making out and my thigh is grinding between hers. When I reach down to touch her, though, she enjoys it for a little bit but never gets off.

When she masturbates, she orgasms. From what I gather, her technique is applying pressure *through clothes, over labia* to clitoris until climax. 

Can you guys give me any tips or ideas for other grinding-type things we can do together that might be fun? Sorry for the vague wording here. ",lgbtsex
I cum too fast during anal,"So I'm bi (19/M) and when I'm have anal with another guy and I'm a bottom, I cum way too fast during it. It can go from 10 to 30 seconds. I've only done it a few times. Does anyone have any tips to not cum as fast? Thanks!",lgbtsex
[Advice] My girlfriend (19F) wants to perform [anilingus] on me (20F)?,"I don't know how to go about this? 

My girlfriend and I have been together for about 8 months, and we've always got on very well together sexually. I'm really big on communication, which has helped the both of us open up to each other and try out things we like. Recently she gained the confidence to tell me that she likes receiving pain during sex, and now that I know that there's a huge difference in her sexual satisfaction for the better. 

We've talked a lot about exploring little kinkier things, light bondage etc. And she asked me whether I would be open to receiving anilingus. And the thing is, I'm not sure. I know many gay guys dabble in this activity, but by my research and general conception this seems much rarer between two women. 

She's not pressuring me, and just said to let her know when I have a more definitive answer. 

I have no idea how to go about it, and I have concerns. In principle, though, I'm down to try a lot. How does hygiene work? I always make sure to pee after getting penetrated vaginally to not get infection, but if she rims me should she wash her mouth out before kissing me anywhere else? That's what I would guess would be the most sanitary, but I'm not sure if that's reasonable. Should we get tested before this, and what should we get tested for? Do I have to shave my ass? How clean do I have to get things down there? 

I've also considered the idea of using a dental dam/plastic barrier of some kind, which we've never used before. Does that affect the experience at all?",lgbtsex
"Help, weird sensation when getting a BJ.","So my penis' head is oversensitive. It doesnt hurt. It only happens if I rub the head of my penis with my palm, I get this weird sensation and cause my body to twitch, like if my lower body has been so relaxed that it lost its feelings. Its almost like there were too many nerve systems there. It also happens when someone give me blowjob, when they play with my penis head with their tongue, it also give me that same sensation. I am uncut and 24. Help.",lgbtsex
Some tips about oral?,"Yo, sorry if my grammar isn't quite good, I will try to make myself clear. Basically, I've only done oral once when I was with my partner, just once because before that I felt like scared of doing it, not because I would grab some fucked up STD but just didn't comfortable doing it. Of course it didn't go perfect as it was the first and only time I did it (only swallowed the tip) so I was wondering if any of you could explain some things to me. My major worry is that when I try to ""practice"" with my fingers I always get this feeling of I'm going to puke, I don't know if I go too far (it's like this little thing on the throath which swings when you talk? I don't know how it's called) and my fear is that I really wanna do it, but I'm afraid of puking or worse if I try it someday with a guy. Any advice you could give me?",lgbtsex
Potential first time for MM hookup...is safe really safe?,"Ok, so I am a very bi curious man entering my 5th decade. 

As a student in the early 90's I experimented a little, and liked it. A lot, but it was only light stuff. So, last year I had a health issue that caused me to evaluate my life, and although I am recovered I realized that sex isn't everything but I sure do regret not going further with MM sex.

Lately, life being what it is,  this opportunity has come my way again and I really would like some experienced people to tell me how safe is safe etc so I can allow myself to take the opportunity or not, as the case may be.

I would be probably partaking in mutual oral (without condoms) and receptive anal (with condoms). The other male is presumably reasonably sexually active as he has been out since his divorce a decade ago, and of course he says he is safe. In my country we have testing but no certificates are habitually provided unless you go via your doctor and not the sexual health services.

TL/DR - I want to have sex with another man, but have been too scared to do so for all of my adult life due to (excessive?) concerns regarding STI's...but I don't want to die without doing it",lgbtsex
"I had an unexpected freak-out during make-out, I don't know why.","So I was making out with my fiance,  he was nibbling on my neck, giving me goosebumps, which I enjoyed. Then he started chewing and growling and I was in ecstacy, hardly abe to control my moans, which were more like ""aaiieeee"" then ""mmmmm""... at some point I pushed him away, needing a break. I told him I was feeling over-stimulated.

So he starts slowly working his way down, and Im all super-twitchy and hyper-sensitive and I'm telling him "" be soft, go slow"" and he starts munching on my inner thigh and my body is wanting to thrash about violently and I can no longer stop myself from bucking him off me, so I'm pushing on his shoulders saying ""stop, time out, let me up, I have to pee!"" Only I didn't make it to the bathroom, as soon as I hit the floor I collapsed and started crying. I don't know why.

He was upset, today telling me I made him feel like he was raping me. 

I don't know why I freaked out. I tried telling him I was over stimulated.  I do not fault him in pressing himself on me, I WAS wanting it and when I was tripped/triggered? I probably said ""stoptimeoutletmeupihavetopee!"" Not really giving him time to comprehend and respond and I was already freaked, so I don't think it has anything to do with rape/power struggle. I was afraid I would kick him or the wall or hurt him, and though I was thinking I enjoyed the makeout, my body was screaming stop. 

Any ideas to help me understand what happened? ",lgbtsex
Looking for recommendations on a prostate massager.,"I can spend some cash, but not looking for anything extravagant.  I've no idea where my prostate is, so I may need something with a bit of reach or intended for beginners.",lgbtsex
[Need Advice] First Time for Two Virgin Guys,"A little background: we're both inexperienced - never had relationships or sexual contact before. We both trust each other and are committed to a monogamous relationship. We're both vers and want to try anal and rimming.

* Is there any risk of disease or infection (besides UTIs)?
* Are condoms necessary? Do they feel as good for either the top or bottom?
* Do I need to give myself an enema every time? Is that healthy?
* What tests should I take before having sex? (I just want to be certain I won't hurt him.)
* Tips for our first time?
* Your preferred lube and condom brands?

I just want it to be safe and special. I'd appreciate any advice. Thank you &lt;3",lgbtsex
why hasn't he asked me out again?,"We got to 3rd base back in December. I'm MtF pre-HRT, and he is heteroflexible. We had already been on a few dates before this. We talked about if he was cool if I wasn't in drag when we met, and he said yes. We met at his place, had an ok night, (I think conversation is a little awkward with him sometimes, but otherwise it was a nice night) then we got intimate. I was pretty excited, he was at first too, then he lost his erection. I was disappointed, but the night wasn't ruined or anything! I understand an erection is a fragile thing, believe me. We kissed a lot, he even kissed me goodbye after he walked me to my car. I had fun.I waited for a while, because of new years and Christmas, and then asked him twice now if he wanted to hang out at his place again and he rejected me both times. I know he is busy, he lives a pretty active lifestyle on top of a full-time job. So there are totally logical explanations that aren't 'he doesn't like you' but I'm still neurotic over the whole ordeal. I didn't shave my legs when we met because he said he was fine if I wasn't in drag and that he wasn't afraid of feeling gay. and I asked him later if he minded that and he said ""didn't bother me, do what makes you happy"" you know actually, its funny, while writing this I was skimming through all the text's we've sent since then to find that message so I could quote him properly, and that really reassured me. You don't keep in contact with a person like he has if you don't like them. Knowing me though, I will eventually start feeling neurotic again, so since I already have all this written down I may as well post it. Do you think I put him off? Why do you think he hasn't asked me over to his place? Should I just keep asking him out until he has time? I don't want to seem like I want in his pants too desperately, and he already rejected me twice, so...

eddit: spelling and grammar   ",lgbtsex
Who else is wants to hook up just for sex?,"Is there any like minded females around my area Marysville/ Everett that would prefer a Nsa hook up.  Meet up, use eachother until where satisfied, then go home until next time.  FWB is where it's at cause theres no awkward moments, there isn't any expectations besides getting off, you can let you're inner freak come out without fear of being judged. And if you and your partner end up hitting it off then cool. How do you feel about NSA encounters and why?",lgbtsex
I just had a scheduled sex date with a stranger,"I met this girl on a dating app and I was very blunt about what I was looking for. We met for a drink, I liked her vibe so we decided we meet up the same week for some shameless one night stand sex. 

We talked about stds, consent, time, and place. I just always thought of these things as being super trashy, turns out they're not! In fact, I felt like it was very classy because it brought about so much open mindedness and understanding. 

I live in a big city, she was from out of town, which kind of helped me not being as nervous. I just wanted to say fuck slut shaming, we had mind blowing sex, and I'm completely fine with never seeing her again, that's what we both wanted, just to enjoy the moment then and there!   

",lgbtsex
Scared of losing virginity?,"I'm now in my second semester of my first year at university. I was closeted throughout my teenage years and went to great lengths to hide my sexuality as I attended a catholic school and grew up in a fairly religious household. A family member was rejected for being a lesbian and I'm terrified the same happens to me. Very few people from back home attend my university and so I've been slowly attending LGBT society socials, frequenting gay bars and socialising with other queer folks. I even have a close circle of friends here who accept me for who I am and this is the first time in my life that I've had this experience. 

Things would be great if it wasn't for the fact that I am terrified of sex. I am perfectly fine after a few drinks. The other night i kissed five different girls in a gay bar and was perfectly happy and confident. I had a girl home for a make out session today and the minute her hands tried to unclasp my bra i panicked and pulled away. She was chill with this and said we would only do what I was comfortable doing and we could go at a slower pace if I wanted but I was still a little panicky i guess. This was the farthest id ever gone with someone and I felt inadequate. This fear of sex has happened before. I jump when hands wander too far and I find myself often freezing up and growing very insecure.

I think my fear stems from two things- lack of knowledge and insecurity about how I look. Firstly, I received very limited sex education in high school. I got the basic ""sperm + egg = baby"" and puberty lessons but after that I only had religious education. In my school, this held a mostly ""abstinence only"" policy. I feel I was told all of the negatives of sex (the pain of losing your virginity, the STDs and pregnancies which can occur and the ""respect you lose when you do it"") and so I feel guilty, ignorant and fearful when it comes to sex. I have no idea what sex with either gender is like and this probably just feeds my fear. Secondly, I have a huge number of scars. I suffered from severe acne throughout my teen years and it is only just clearing up now that I am 18. My breasts, face, chest and arms in particular bore the brunt of this and so are covered with icepick scars and little red marks. My chest is a particular insecurity as i feel this is were the wounds are most noticeable. I have several other scars (from childhood accidents, burns and other little marks from my waitressing job, stretch marks, insect bites and self harm) and i feel very self conscious about these. I've tried getting rid of them but nothing seems to have worked yet. I'm also self concious about my weight as I have always been ""curvier"" than my more slender female family members and have a chubbier stomach and thighs in particular. I also feel as if i've gained the infamous  ""fresher fifteen"" recently. All of these come together into a toxic mix and make me feel very vulnerable and inadequate. 

Is there any way I can get over these issues and stop being so fearful and anxious over this? I feel as if I will be ready soon but I just want to get over these issues in a healthy way before I end up getting a reputation as a tease or a prude. Has anyone else been through this before? I feel like the only 18 year old on the planet who has this amount of problems with sex. ",lgbtsex
My GF doesn't care for my pleasure,"I've been in a relationship for about 6 months, in bed she orgasms at least 2-3 times. I love having her in every way, then she gets on top and starts to fuck me, while doing that I start touching her, then she instantly gives in and melts into my arm.

Whenever she happen to be fucking me, it never ever feels intimate, as if she's on a mission and just waiting for this to be over..  

Also when she's touching me, she sometimes suddenly stops and  gets mad and starts crying because she says she feels shes not good enough. 
We communicate very openly, I tell her what I like and don't like, I tell her how and where and all that stuff, she is just absolutely the worst at reading body language. I try to be patient, we tried many things.

When I fuck her for so long and I just enjoy every bit of it, and then by the end of all that she ends up getting mad that I'm not as horny as she is, she thinks i'm not attracted to her as much as shes attracted to me. 


This is a pretty consistent issue. In our time together I can honestly say I probably climaxed twice, we fuck about 4-5 times a week.
Is it something to break up over? 
It's spilling over into our relationship and I'm starting to absolutely loathe the sight of her naked. 

",lgbtsex
where to find lesbian hookup,i really want to have a practice round of casual sex before i actually have sex with my future partner how could i go about that. im just afraid ill be bad and i want to learn with someone.,lgbtsex
[survey] Sexual Minority Women &amp; the LGBTQ+ Community,"My name is Shelby and I’m a Psychology and Gender Studies undergraduate student. I’m conducting a brief survey on sexual minority women, gender presentation, and the LGBTQ community for my thesis research and would love your participation. I am looking for sexual minority women above the age of 18. Your participation should take about 10 minutes and will enable you to provide your voice in research that directly impacts your community. 

Here is the link to the survey: 
https://www.surveymonkey.com/r/D2FSQY5

If you have any questions, contact me at shelby.statham13@ncf.edu. 

Thank you!",lgbtsex
Problematic with my sex life,"As young as pre school, I already knew I was gay. And at that age as well, my abuser started doing stuff without penetration. It progressed from dry humping to full on anal sex when i was 12. He was 14. That was the first and last time I had sex. Now i am already 25y.o.
I really don't know but I guess being exposed to so much porn at a yound age makes me a horny person. But I get off by masturbating a lot. I may have have some run ins with men but they are all blowjobs and not one of them came. No one climaxed. I reason myself out by telling them i am too tired or lazy to continue on. I just stop. I can also count with my fingers the men i sucked, there are exactly 6 men since 2010. And i repeat and kid you not, they never climaxed, never came. Maybe i lack the abilities but i really don't give a shit.haha.
Anyway, i came here to write about my relationship status, relationshit honestly. I am an active grindr user. The first one i met, i kind of liked the guy. We met and dated on the spot, and then we said to each other we were a couple already. But infatuation already wore off and the next thing i know, i dumped him in a snap. No sex. The next guy i met while i traveled to this place with my friends. I agreed on meeting him and we dated for like 2hours. I instantly wanted him. I already loved him before the time was up and i had to go. We texted, we called and maintained a long distance relationship for 10months until he was gone. That was an on and off relationship. For 10months. I loved the guy, I was hooked. No sex. He's a daddy at 36y.o. My perfect man. I don't know but i am easily attracted to men who are older. Men who are mature. I was and still devastated when he stopped calling so abruptly.
I have to move on. I hope to be in a real relationship already. I want to. I hope i get to experience that soon. I need advice on how to be more active in the dating scene. I hope you can help.",lgbtsex
Review of anal lube,,lgbtsex
Tips for better bottoming?,"I recently got into a sexual relationship again with my ex, and I'm trying to avoid the same problems that led to us slowing down to a virtual stop in the bedroom- mainly my lack of preparation. 

My main problem  has always been that with my busy life style i don't have as much time to prepare for it- we have terrible food habits based on our budget, i don't have enough time to prepare and do an enema session... 


hes got his own problems mainly with always being in the mood but not always being able to maintain erection or the preferred firmness to be enjoyable for both of us. 


on top of that there's times when my entry becomes too slick or somehow too loose to accommodate or please- this mainly happening on times that ive had very little time to prepare and both of us wanted it but couldn't stand the mess..


what tips would you give for myself with regards to staying clean longer and staying tighter, and what tips do you have for him in order that we may help him maintain a harder erection for longer?

",lgbtsex
nervous,"I'm actively bisexual, but I've only ever actually had sex with cis men. I want to start having sex with women and trans people, but I'm worried I'll be bad at it. Any advice?",lgbtsex
Partner has a history of being sexually abused by his ex. Needing advice on what I can do to help him overcome?,"While his ex's deeds get much darker than that, I'll not bring that into focus.  

My beautiful partner was used and abused sexually by his ex.  Constantly bitched at, cheated on, told he was inadequate, the ex watched porn and jerked it while my partner got locked in a room after sex...  I cried just hearing about it.  

Between that and some much darker shit the ex did, my partner suffers from a host of personal, physical, and mental problems.  And uses a rather potent cocktail of medicines to manage it all.

Back to topic, we've discussed sex at length.  And I've made it very clear that I'd respect his boundaries; if he needs me to change it up or stop altogether that I'd comply.  And I've been gentle with him on the occasions we've done it: lots of kissing, caressing, feather touch, and going on mainly about his pleasure.  And when he's asked me to pull out, I did just that.  Even in positioning, I tried to make sure he knew he had control and could change or stop at anytime he needed.  They were big steps for him, and I've openly praised him for the strides he's made since those days.  I even bottom for him, which he never got to do until he met me; being well-endowed like he is means not many folks would handle it and I require at-length stretching to prepare for. 

He's responded positively to my efforts.  States he wants to have more sex, and see about changing up his medicines to bring his libido up.  And I've responded in kind by continuing to support this as best I can, and remaining open to any suggestions he might have for me.

It isn't that I don't trust him; to the contrary, I wanna marry him someday if we can keep building our relationship, which we are.  It's just that I think there might be something he's scared to tell me for fear of losing me.  Which brings me here to seek advice.  While I do want an active sex life with him, I also wanna continue to be considerate of his needs and limits.

And now for the million-dollar question.  Is there anything else I can do beyond what I've mentioned to help him continue to succeed?",lgbtsex
How to go about that...26/mtf,"Hi folks,
So, I realized that I am transgender about a year ago now. I only came out to my mother and a few select friends online though. I have no access to HRT or therapy (though I am working on the latter...to get the former) so I pass 0%.
I've only been single for 8 months now after my very first relationship, so I'm really not experienced with dating at all too.

The thing is: At this point I am tired of lying. I don't want to meet people while hiding behind my deadname, I want people to know from the start... I'm just so afraid to even try because of my clearly testosterone-laden appearance.

Any help would be appreciated, I don't know...maybe I just needed to vent that.",lgbtsex
"Started bottoming recently (8 months back), and now I feel the phatom urge to ""go"" all the time, even when there's nothing there.","Hey guys, I'm a 30 year old guy who only ever really topped until about eight months ago. I always just felt like the more dominant one and I love fucking hot ass, looking at the guys face while I made him cum from the inside..covering the mouth to muffle to sounds and feel the hot breath-- well, you know.

Anyway I met this really hot and masculine guy, and at first I was topping him, which was awesome, but then one day in bed after we had just fucked he asked if he could fuck me someday and I thought, ""Absolutely.""

I'm pretty savvy about anal, and with this guy I was able to relax completely and was extremely turned on, so honestly it was great from the beginning. Very minimal pain at the start, all sorts of new pleasures and hard-to-articulate sensations after that.

This guy and I got tested together so we weren't using condoms, (we trust each other a lot). Then, recently, I met another guy and my main f-buddy said it would be fine to bottom for this guy (with protection) and I did, twice in one week.

I have to say, this guy was younger (24) and really strong and fucked me harder than anyone ever has and was just drilling my ass like a rabbit. It was really, really hot and felt amazing at the time.

However. Before now I've never really noticed any side effects from bottoming at all-- everything seemed normal. But now it's like a week later, and my sphincter still kind of vaguely aches, and I feel like I have to take a crap constantly, and when I do go, I never feel like I ""finished"" completely.. I know I'm empty but it feels like the job's not done.

Has anyone else experienced this? Do i just need to take a break and let my butt reset itself? I went from no bottoming to at least twice a week with a guy whose dick is about six inches, pretty thick. No problems for months until the hot young muscle guy pounded the cum out of me with a condom on lol.

Edit: The young muscle-guy's dick was about the same size as my regular buddy's, maybe just slightly smaller.",lgbtsex
Different libidos,"Okay, so basically I have a high sex drive, like really quite high. Sex means a lot to me because for me it expresses how I feel and I can get quite insecure so its a helpful reminder that I'm wanted and desired after.

My girlfriend who I love and adore to pieces doesn't like sex. That's not to say she doesn't enjoy it when its happening. But it takes a lot to get to get her into that mood.

I'm her first girl relationship and she doesn't communicate well. She's admitted she doesn't really touch herself, she's never had an orgasm and that she could quite happily live without sex - which is a disaster for how I think and interpret sex.

I'm not the type of person to brag, like insanely not, but I know what I'm doing and its frustrating that she doesn't orgasm but I know that's not her fault or mine. But the frustration lies in just not having sex anyway.

I'm super happy receiving or giving but I'm not experiencing either. I feel as though I'm a sex addict compared to her. 
We've talked and we both know we have different sex drives but its getting to the point where I don't feel wanted. There's lots of issues at the moment with her personal life, so she's stressed, she doesn't eat overtly healthy, and I know that being with a girl is new.

From what I've gathered, I've been the best person she's been with sexually, so I'm struggling to not take it personally when she says no. In my head it's like ""You enjoy it but you don't want it...."" Like logically in my head it doesn't make sense.

She means a lot to me, not having sex as often as I would prefer is certainly not a deal-breaker but I struggle.

I'm patient, understanding and think pretty logically all the time. But I just have no idea what to do or how to go about this without making her feel bad or feeling forced to do something she doesn't want to do - which I'd never want!",lgbtsex
Guys of reddit: Anyone ever get a bruise on your dick from using a cock ring...? I'm not sure if I should be worried of it it will go away on it's own.,,lgbtsex
22 gay male and having some problems in enjoying sex,"So, my last three or four sexual encounters where just awful. I could receive handjobs, blowjobs just fine and really enjoyed it, but when it was time to fuck, things got hard. I was a top, and it was a struggle for me to penetrate without _help_ from the other guy. When I was finally in, orgasm came in less than two minutes.

That was when sex became unpleasant. My interest in sex just vanishes after I cum, and I start to get disgust and fear of getting STD. I just can't concentrate on getting my partner satisfied and I feel guilty after it's over.

What do you think I could do to really enjoy sex? Should I stop masturbating and watching porn?",lgbtsex
19 (M) Having issues bottoming for long periods.,"So, I really enjoy bottoming, and I've done it plenty enough to know what works and what doesn't. However, I've noticed on several occasions, that when he has me bent over and he's going to town, I can't take it for long. I can do missionary and cowboy all day long, but when he's taking me from behind, I can't stand it for long at all. It's not so much that it hurts on the inside, but it's almost like it's the friction from where's he's repeatedly going in and out. I've tried using more lube, but even still, I can't stand it. Any advice?

tldr; Bottoming hurts in doggy style because friction's a bitch.",lgbtsex
"41(M) For those ""straight"" guys that have experimented in a MM sex acts - did you regret it?","Hi all.  
41(M) only have had sex with woman and don't find guys sexy at all.  That said I have had a long term fantasy about the sex act with a penis.  

I've thought long and hard about exploring this, even if it just checks it off my lists and I never do it again.  I am interested to hear from other guys that were maybe in the same situation.  
How did you go about finding a casual guy to basically use as a sex toy and did you regret it or enjoy it afterwords?

I'm thinking about just giving a BJ but I had a recent GF who pegged me and that was a major turn on so maybe I would do more.  

Thoughts?",lgbtsex
How to massage your prostate,,lgbtsex
A Sexual Philosophy; Ethical Hedonism,,lgbtsex
[17F] This sounds ridiculously stupid but I'm scared of lesbian sex,"Saying that I'm scared of lesbian sex probably isn't the best way to put it, but it sort of just intimidates me.

I'm 17 f bi, and have known/acknowledged my queerness for about two years now, but lesbian sex still scared me

I have never kissed anyone let alone had sex with anyone, but I feel like when it comes to it I won't know what to do, WHAT DOES ONE DO, LITERALLY

I also don't know how to meet other LGBT people and I really want to because I feel really lonely at the moment. 

Thanks in advance x",lgbtsex
I'm think I'm pretty straight but sometimes I like to meet up with a guy,Sometimes I hookup with guys to get bjs. I want to try to do anal(top) but once I'm with a guy I feel turned off thinking about having anal sex. Did anyone else have this problem ,lgbtsex
